In the bright eternal city,
Charrettes are hosted with partner organizations. Topics identified so far include:
I am guilty of using bleach for everything. That's my main go to cleaning supplies before I was introduced to Baby Harmony's line of products. After trying their Non-Chlorine Bleach I was impressed at how white my clothes got after one wash. Plus its safe to use on colors as well!! That is just what I was looking for to wash my towels with, since I couldn't ever bleach my colored towels. This is a wonderful product and works well with their Laundry Soap!
Man-o-man time has slipped past me this week, Happies. As a result, posts have been a little on the slim side but I’m sure you’re all understanding and I do apologise for my lack of correspondence.
I'm definately going to do more of this...I'm hooked! Expect more henna experiment photos soon. Next time I might even try to do a video as well.
One of the pleasures of travelling is checking out another country's cheese scene so I was looking forward to finding out what Istria in northern Croatia had to offer when I visited it last week.
Waiting: to get life on track.
Arizona Cardinals: C+
Alkaline water according to some references is what is referred to as lye water in the west. However some say that it is simply alkaline water and you should do a litmus paper test to determine the pH of your tap water. Pure water has a pH of around 7.0. If the pH is more than 7.0, it is alkaline, if it is lower it is acidic. If your water isn't alkaline, adding baking soda to it can make it alkaline. The water in my area is very hard and alkaline so I just used tap water.
Interestingly, my mom thinks Valentine’s day is cheesy. So I thought she would like this dish. I cooked lunch on Valentines day to show that I love my family .
I've also felt like the juggle of time meant the kids were not always getting the best of my time and that just didn't sit well with me. SO, it was time for some changes to be made.
You can sign up with me right now. Any time before May 2 and you will get a $10 discount just for being an early bird. And you know what they say about the early bird. Get on it, you won’t regret it!
To serve to those, in spirit, poor,
… is hard. But worth it.
And gently,
As you can see, I've added a piece of acetate (which I've also embossed with a Rose folder) inside the oval cut out.
um. no. there's one about too many pots on the fire.
So tonight I was happy I was going to see you. I carried that clear through until we sat down, and then I started to get angry and sad again.
Ever since the death of her parents, Miranda has lived on Whym Island, taking comfort in the local folklore, which claims a mysterious sea witch controls the fate of all on the island and in its surrounding waters. Sometimes it’s just easier to believe things are out of your control.
CM Punk emerging in Chicago is always the best. It is something that encapsulates what I love about pro wrestling: well, love. Part of me feels like the Ryback squash didn’t do enough to recharge the crowd from the awesome World Title match, but this reaction was at least it’s equal, and so was the match. The match itself – apart from the unfortunate formality of the Championship introductions – didn’t waste any time in then getting going, straight in to a ‘Pier 6′ brawl and the early introduction of kendo sticks and some sick kendo shots (seriously, look at the welts on Jericho’s back, if you can!). An impassioned Punk was dominating, so it made sense when the cowardly Jericho went to the referee for salvation before the veteran Jericho used the position to give Punk a thumb to the eye followed by a nice dropkick. There then followed some very unscientific but compelling brawling at ringside, punctuated by Jericho exposing the steel of the barricade in front of Punk’s sister and slamming Punk’s head in to it, before eyeing up Punk’s sister, being slapped by her, and looking to go after her. This was an important point in the match, not only in storyline with Punk’s sister’s involvement, but because the heinousness of Jericho’s implied intentions brought Punk’s urgency, and that of the match, up a further gear. Not only that, but this was pretty much her only involvement in the match aside from visual reminder of the personal nature of the feud. Best use of family in wrestling since, well, CM Punk and Rey Mysterio. Forcing himself to recover, Punk leapt on Jericho just in time to stop him before going nuts at ringside and tearing up the announce tables in foreshadowing of carnage. Until this point, i’ve always though attacks with announce table hoods are weak and shouldn’t be done, but in this match, it really worked, when Punk slammed Jericho through one that was propped up against the announce table, before Jericho would later hit Punk with a tough blow with the broken half of the hood. Punk went on to tease a stomach-churning piledriver on the concrete, but Jericho managed to reverse in to a back body drop before taking the initiative with a shot to the spine of Punk with a monitor. This really was a nonstop, drag-out, brutal brawl, and it was unsurprising that they changed pace a little following it, returning to the ring for Jericho to dominate some. In fact, Jericho got such a hand over Punk that he was able to leave the ring to get a beer to pour on Punk before getting another for himself. The second was too far though, and showed the exact arrogance of a guy who thinks he’s the best in the world despite losing to the best a month prior – it allowed Punk t come back with some sweet, stiff kicks which led to multiple beer spits from Jericho. This was closely followed by more harsh kendo shots, including a brilliantly timed and executed kendo-assisted heel kick from Punk. This was the next step up in gears as the action quickened and we moved towards signature and finisher territory with Punk shouldering Jericho for a GTS which was reversed in to a Liontamer/Walls of Jericho attempt which was really convincing and made Punk look great and resilient to escape from. Shortly after came another, even better progression which could only be pulled off by two of the best, with perfect timing. Again attempting a GTS, Jericho escaped and hit a bulldog; looking for a Lionsault, Punk recovered, and caught Jericho exactly as he hit the ropes, and with Jericho caught on the ropes, Punk grappled him back to his shoulders for another GTS attempt, which Jericho again escaped before sending Punk into a wedged chair in the corner. This section in the ring really started to combine well the brutality of earlier with the drama of great wrestling and near-falls, and this only got more tense after Jericho hit a surprise Codebreaker from nowhere and then locked Punk in another Walls of Jericho, with Punk looking ever more likely to tap before eventually, again, making the ropes. With Jericho exploiting the Street Fight rules, Punk was forced to take what was at hand to escape, and what he used was the fire extinguisher which he first sprayed Jericho with before brutalising him with it. Punk followed Jericho on his escape, with the extinguisher, to the outside, a final shot laying Jericho out on the Spanish Announce Table. It was obvious what was coming, but that anticipation in pro wrestling, like with a lot of great spectacles, only makes the event sweeter, and so (despite the exhausted Punk barely being able to stay on the turnbuckle) when Punk finally flew through the air to connect with a Macho Man elbow through the table with Jericho, the crowd went mad and were simultaneously even more amazed by what they saw, especially given the table crashing looked even more devastating than usual. Punk then – after recovering himself- pushed Jericho in the ring and went for a count. This signified the beginning of the end. Punk only got a good near fall, but obviously unsatisfied, he went straight for an Anaconda Vice. Now I don’t know if this was intentional, but this section mirrored HHH in Undertaker’s Hell’s Gate from both WrestleManias 27 and 28 in that it involved the victim reaching out for, and then dropping a nearby weapon; the only difference here being that Jericho managed to keep a hold of the weapon and used it to bash Punk over the head to escape. Following this came the best near-fall of the night, and a really inventive one. Punk tried to keep control of the match, reaching for a chair he had tossed in to the ring ages earlier; driving it in to Jericho’s gut, Jericho grabbed the chair in that position, and used it for an amazingly smooth, chair assisted Codebreaker. I was convinced of a Jericho win, nut no! Punk survived! A frustrated Jericho, ever the meglomaniac, then picked up and shouldered Punk as if looking to beat him with his own move, only this time, Punk escaped, slingshotted Jericho in to the exposed turnbuckle before finally (after setting it up for the whole match, several times) hitting his GTS for a great, Match of the Year worthy, win! It was the best finish of the night by far in its inventiveness and unpredictability, and let Punk add another great defense to his ever-swelling reign. It was a totally different match to their masterpiece at WrestleMania, and just goes to show the breadth of their capabilities. I loved the carnage left behind them after the match: weapons, broken wood, a stripped and a destroyed announce table, and two spend warriors. This was another war. The only problem is, it’s going to get hard to justify the continuance of this great feud. Jericho was ‘given’ another shot after WrestleMania, but it perhaps needs too much grace for him to get another one, especially given Punk has now beaten by pin and submission. I hope they do get ‘one more match’, but if it does, it will need a significant progression from the alcoholism angle, most righteously involving Jericho ‘needing’ to beat Punk. If not then both men will need new opponents. For Jericho, it’s wide open, but I would figure he’d move on to a young up-and-coming face (and there aint too many of them! – Kofi Kingston, again?). As for Punk, I figure there could surely be only one man in line for a title shot, and i’ll speak on that later in the report.
and Francis is the proof of this.
I don't really know if the ice bath helped much. My knees are still sore, but not as bad as yesterday. I plan to take some advil, maybe put some ice packs on, perhaps elevate my feet, definitely go for a walk to keep my other muscles from stiffening, but I do not plan to ever, ever take another ice bath. Unless of course I run more than 18 miles.
Readers of the Saturday Daily Telegraph in Sydney may have noticed the above article written by food editor Grant Jones on "The secret world of culinary bloggers", a somewhat odd title given the very public sphere in which we publish the minutiae of our lives and meals.
Really? This is the best we can do? This is what it’s all about? These are the things that make our lives worth living?
Even though the book is beautifully written, I found it rather boring and hard to read. It was just one of those books I couldn’t enjoy. I found the plot to be rather slow. I would recommend the book to others just because I like the descriptive language throughout the book, that’s it.
I am from Bellingham, Washington, which is only about 1.5-2 hours north of Seattle. When I came back from Costa Rica I came back to my parents house. I had moved all my belongings back in with my parents before I left, since my lease at my apartment of two years expired a week after I left. And I wasn’t coming back to Seattle as a UW student, but as a graduate. I came home to realize how much I missed Seattle, to realize how much I had missed my friends and family, and how connected I really was to where I spent most of my life. I had a similar experience when I left for a month to go to Europe my senior year of high school- you learn to value what you have when you leave, especially when you come home. Now that I am back I am planning a return trip to Monteverde for an uncertain amount of time, but after that I am looking at a potential for National Parks job seasonally in Alaska. However, I am also starting to look into NGO jobs that would be more permanent. It is difficult not to have lag time in between school and the rest of your life when you spend your last school term abroad, still unsure of both what you want and what your options are. Ultimately, my point is that I said good bye to everyone before I left for Costa Rica knowing it wouldn’t be the same when I came back. I was right and wrong at the same time. Right in that it is certainly not since I spend most of my time in another town and come to Seattle as a visitor, however most friendships were similar when I came back. While I don’t endorse making such big decisions based on your friends and where they are- I would offer that it is important to be aware that after college ends keeping friendships is a choice and cannot be passive or they drift away. It shouldn’t change the choice of studying abroad, but perhaps how you plan before leaving and when you return.
Momma and I went down to visit my niece (her granddaughter) B last week. It was a nice drive with great company, something we normally don’t get to do together. B was unhinged from a recent breakup and stress from upcoming finals. It was a crazy, wild visit! It was absolutely exhausting, but so good to see everyone. It had been many months since my last visit.
So, now it’s a game. And a game I really don’t want to play anymore. I didn’t realize he wasn’t getting good consolidated sleep until weeks after his habits started. It’s amazing how you can tell yourself “oh, he is just not feeling well” or “he’s teething and is having a hard time staying asleep.” You really do just make excuses and give in until you are totally giving into everything.
Here’s where my best friend comes in. Erica, a graphic design major and my since-college-bestie, is talented and knows me inside and out, including my “less is more” attitude. When we started throwing ideas around, she had me collect inspiring photos and covers to give her a better idea of what I was looking for. I had NO idea what I wanted at first. Literally, not a clue. I knew what I wanted the cover to have in it, but didn’t know how to make it come together.
In our area it’s the season of races, steeplechase and hunt type horse races. You can make a day of it, taking along a “tailgate” picnic to dine alfresco and actually right out of the back of your car or tailgate. You will be in good company and rub shoulders with other like-minded folks.
Please post your comments/questions on The Space Show blog. If you have conference specific questions, you can use the Contact page on their website, http://glex2012.org/contact.
–you like grinding (for crafting mats, gear, prestige, fishing, whatever)
This thrifty egg recipe comes from Jane Acquino, of Nashua, who says about the dish: “Yummo! It has been a favorite go-to recipe of mine for many, many years. This is good especially if you go to a brunch or potluck.”
There’s almost nothing more satisfying than creating something beautiful…..and then selling it (at least in my book).
So that is how I approached this card.....basic cardstock folded simply, added some pretty background paper, a fun stamp set and simple colouring! Throw in some flower embellishments, pretty yarn and some bling - and voila!
I make my own root beer too! It's the easiest thing. AHS has two types of root beer extracts, one is normal root beer extract and one is a birch root beer extract. That birch one has that ZING!, that bite you taste in Barq's. I mix the two extracts half and half.
PS - How are you guys liking Chanel Fall? I ordered the Peridot polish, so that will be here tomorrow. I'm not really feeling the rest of it. The quad is beautiful, but it looks like Kaska Beige and Stupendous had a baby, and I have both of them. Too bad we can't truly breed Chanel quads haha
The anti-minivan stance is just plain silly when you think about it. Bry was so freaked out about what having a minivan meant that I really couldn't wrap my head around it. But I guess, I kind of figured it out. Buying the minivan was the last big step making us grown-ups. I guess for some people it's buying your first home, for others the birth of their first child, and for Bry it was the minivan.
The locals are used to the extremely huge array of limousines and people carriers that it holds within its muddy car park.
After reading the instructions, I decided it sounded pretty cool, so I tried it out. I said, "bananas" and it gave me a choice of
How many should I start to prepare?
But you know what? I gave him the middle finger in my head, brushed myself off, and worked like a BOSS. The day went very well. And I came home to find an online clothing order on my doorstep.
The last game of the weekend, so both of these two will know what is required. Arsenal will have to win to try keep pace with Chelsea for the Champions League spot, but they could go into this match as low as seventh in the table should Newcastle and Liverpool record away wins on Saturday.
Hands down the most interesting experience we had all weekend, though, was our ill-fated attempt at getting tickets to the Kanye West/ Jay Z concert. It was sort of a last minute decision, and since the show was sold out, we headed down to the concert and try to pick up some tickets from the dudes hanging around outside of the stadium.
Observe how prejudice and hostile Bevere gets towards Christians who prefer house churches,
Ok, now that I have your attention, let me explain. Back when I was in school, the second time around...was called "a returning student," which means old fart. Anyway, many of my art professors advised us as to how make our art and make it our own, carefully making a rep for ourselves and being "recognized" for that work. Most of my profs followed their own advise, teaching what they knew best, except my ceramic prof...he got into all kinds of weird materials...no clay involves at all. I wonder if he was affected by one of his patrons who hung up one of his "donuts" in her black and white bathroom...the poor guy was really embarrassed during the tour of this pretentious bitty's house. However, his openness to other materials, made it easier for some of his students to work on other mediums, such as moi. He hated mixed media....don't know why, but didn't really care because I incorporated all kinds of stuff into my ceramic pieces.
Sub-human bondage have been toppled,
As it starts the story is not much different than that of the other judges. The people of Israel have strayed from the Lord and been ensnared by the lifestyle of idol-worship and self-indulgence. To discipline them, the Lord had turned them over to one of their most persistent enemies, the Philistines, for forty years. It seems that the Israelites were less troubled being subject to the Philistines than they had been in the past by other foreign powers. Perhaps the Philistines were more tolerant and benevolent rulers and less harsh in their subjection. In any case, we read nothing of God's people crying out to the Lord for deliverance.
The emergence of Mbak Hesti with her beautiful blog, Hesti’s Kitchen, is just like a breeze to raise the popularity of eastern Indonesian culinary, especially from Sulawesi. Through her blog, I’m introduced more to the beauty of exotic eastern Indonesian food. And, I never thought before that Sulawesi food can be that pretty and mouthwatering! ^^. The fact that I love about eastern Indonesian food is that it uses more marine product instead of chicken or beef as the main meat source :D.
How do you tell someone to kindly fuck off?
At this point I got frustrated with the movie and sighed loudly several times, which only succeeded in bringing Darwin into the room, looking to be taken for a walk. Which I did. Because the expectations of a dog who might soil your rug are never to be denied.
All that being said, the novella holds promise. I enjoyed it in spite of (and sometimes for) its flaws, though I admit to laughing at times when I was supposed to be pained or titilated. I honestly believe that another draft could have fixed many of the problems.
This was the card that inspired her birthday card today. I loved the elegant simplicity of it, and the color as well, but my sini...I mean sister, being a red head, is more of an autumn-hues loving gal, so I grabbed the Cajun Craze and went from there.
To play along with the June SFYTT, just make a card or other project using the sketch and link it up HERE anytime before the end of the month. Those who participate in all of the 2011 sketch challenges will be eligible for a mega prize drawing at the end of the year. And remember, all future guest designers are chosen from current participants!
As Badass moves the bodies into the shadows, Cesare asks him who was behind this whole affair. Badass says it was just Orsini, that della Rovere knew nothing of it. He had one master, and now he’s like a stray dog, masterless, unless Cesare’s kind offer of employment still stands. Cesare comments that Badass could have let things run their course and betrayed him, because his kind usually does that. Badass hunkers down, looking at his blood-covered hands, and murmurs that he doesn’t have a kind. This guy’s sort of fascinating, I really hope he sticks around for a while. I think there’s some real potential here. Cesare asks the man for his name and Badass says it’s Micheletto. Cesare tells him he’ll have to prove himself worthy of his trust and asks him to get rid of the bodies and meet him by the gates of the Vatican in two hours.
Fundraising was always going to be difficult. As a full-time student away from home, saving up for something as expensive as long-haul flights and seven weeks on the ground in Tanzania is no small ask. But I wanted it more than new dresses, more than weekend meals out, more than train tickets to visit my friends. By the time the next Read training day came around in February, I’d put aside close to half of what I thought I needed.
はち：「自我のカルトが文化の景観を支配している。このカルトはクラシックなサイコパスの特徴を持っている、表面的な魅力、尊大さ、絶え間ない刺激への要求、嘘をつく才能、ごまかしと操作、自責の念を感じる能力の欠落。そしてもちろんこれらは法人企業によって推奨されている道徳である。自我の文化では、私達は望むものはなんでも手に入れる権利がある。私達はお金の為なら、裕福になるためなら、有名になるためならなんでもできる、たとえそれが友達を含む私達の周りの人々を軽視することでも。そして名声や富が手に入れられるとき、私達がやったことは結果論として正当化される。」
Or should I say silver mercury glass??!!
drwxr-xr-x 5 root root 1024 Oct 11 13:13 VRTSmuob
After that it may come as no surprise that Sue’s choice for ‘Fairytale Reflections’ is that tale of hope and transformation -
The New Art Market's Ups and Downs
winning a car, and all the problems that ensued because of it.
And have you seen Sky Habitat? The property developers forgot to include a disclaimer. Something like:
Of course, considering it was 8:30 PM on a Sunday there were no "urgent care clinics" open so off to the "real" ER it was. Where we proceeded to hang out until midnight. That's when the doctor decided, after an X-ray and a tetanus shot, it didn't need stitches. All it needed was a little glue.
I haven't been feeling like myself for the past couple of months, and I think that not writing has had a large part to do with it. There are some other factors too...like a little thing called a BFP. Don't know what that is? Look here:
3-4 cups hashbrowns
Hee hee! You're funny! Here, have a pet monkey on me, as well! Arghh, matey!
I was thrilled. I came up with a couple of options, the director picked the one she liked (I liked that one more myself), and got started. What transpired was a lengthy, slow process of getting it done. Here it is in living color for your entertainment and inspiration.
Papers: generic white card stock, colors by Basic Grey
December 11, 2009 Special Dispatch No.2689
And so we still have a long way to go to settle in but the benefit of having so many bedrooms - we are only using 4 - is that I can put boxes in two bedrooms and marvel at how lovely the rest of the house is looking and how much we have achieved. Finding anything is another matter but I'm getting very good at remembering what is in boxes. My favourite boxes are those I marked 'stuff'. Not very helpful and just full of junk!
The entryway. The landing. The launch pad. The first impression upon entering the home...
Naomi and I started a movie and ate popcorn with M&M's, yum! Here we were together, watching a movie and I couldn't believe how much my little niece has grown up. She has this sense of humor that cracks you up on the spot, she is not to mention beautiful and so respectful.
That’s enough for a start; no need to wallow in it. And, having said all this, I always find myself maintaining and defending plants that, in my heart, I really don’t like. Because they’re mine and because they’re alive, even thriving, despite my ineptitude. So the admission that I’ve just planted two new, double-headed Echinacea in a sunny space should surprise no one.
8. Senselessing
We decorate everything around us, our homes, our yards our sewing rooms and even our children. Now you can decorate your sewing machine! With our sew creative packs decorating a sewing machine has never...never been so much fun and sewing machines have never looked this good. We have 3 color schemes to choose from. Below we have light pink and orange. Be creative, layer and mix and match colors. If you get tired of them, simply peal them off and your ready to add something different.
The House was PACKED!
I nodded. “What about Jaejoong hyung and Yoochun, hyung? Are they shooting their own scene too?” I asked.
Prof. Benzion Netanyahu z”l was one of the generation of giants that founded the modern state of Israel. Where are our giants of today? May his son and colleagues continue his life’s work and vision.
Although these defendants are privileged to make statements that are rationally related to this controversy without incurring additional liabilities to me, such utterances are, nevertheless, admissible to demonstrate their subjective intent to inflict harm. In at least one instance, an attempt is made to raise doubts that I am actually authorized to practice law in New Jersey. (I am so authorized).
The set opened with the track ‘From Sidi Bouzid to Cairo” taken from the latest, more dubstep-heavy EP “Sidi Bouzid Syndrome”. SC Yosh’s opening move on live video installation was a split scene – the top half, which was a serene street scene, seen from bird’s eye view, persisted, whilst the bottom half jolted with clips of soldiers and protestors. Hot reds and scorched yellows flicked back and forth with black and white. The track itself, as the website explains, takes “recordings from the streets of Tunis and Cairo, international media, and pre-revolution propaganda material taken from a video meant to be an Ode to Leila Ben Ali, the Tunisian dictator’s wife”. It is with tracks like this that the band is adding an intelligent and overtly political face to a quality electronic sound.
firm
Too much to ask! A violent wind has swirled
De Vice Cyah Done!
I remember another similar time when I had a horrible allergic skin reaction to something. I have no idea what, but I had broken out into hives everywhere. I was itchy, uncomfortable and miserable. But I just sucked it up, and tried to ignore it. While I was sitting in our room itching every single part of my body, Anna left. I didn't know why she left, but she came back about 15 minutes later with Benadryl cream for me. I never asked her to get me medicine, she just did it without even thinking twice about it. Again - it seems like such a small gesture, but its those small gestures from people that end up meaning the world to someone.
I have finished my 'read the Bible in a year' programme that started last year. It took me a little more than a year, but I feel a sense of satisfaction in having completed it. The 'Honest Bible' programme is in a bit of a hiatus as they struggle through trying to do the Mosaic Law in chronological order, so what should I do next? I find that I have become dependent on the discipline of the year programme. Ken Schenck has been translating a verse from the Psalms every day and thus he is my inspiration to translate one verse from the Greek New Testament every day. Not an enormously demanding exercise, but I think one that will be good for me. Last year I read several chapters every day. Now I will be reading one verse every day. It feels spartan. I will try to keep the Greek blog up to date with my daily reading and translation.
There were countless times when I was made to feel like I was a trained monkey. For some reason my mother thought it was fun to show me off like a circus side show. I could tell people weren't really all that interested and many times it was the wrong place for such things.
We broke HK$18.4 and the 21 EMA at the same time to the upside, and with relatively modest volatility to boot. We have gotten downside breaks in crisis times, (and look at the carnage it caused!) but this is the first similarly bullish break pattern. Also look at the 63 EMA rejection this week (Wednesday) which would have paid you nearly one Hong Kong Dollar per share intra-day, and two until Friday! The channel drawn near the bottom identifies the up-trend uncertainty, and the up-trend which is slightly below it acts almost as a volatility springboard: the stock can push off, dampen its swing, or if the volatility is high enough, break right through. On the Wednesday trade, the volatility wasn’t high enough to overcome both this line and the 63 EMA, so it looks like it’s going higher instead. Anyway, HK$ 19.5 does not seem far off from the trend post-plunge, and the next question instead comes in around the HK$20-21 levels for more serious profit taking around the summer highs if price breaks HK$19.2.
Edited, Indexed & Uploaded By Johnky
Just for today, be honest in your dealings with people
1 1/2 tsp. cayenne powder
Bang –Questions –French pic sleeve
"They squeezed my wrists very hard, beat me in the back in the kidney area, and when people stepped in to do something, they said we were counter-revolutionaries." Sanchez, winner of the Maria Moors Cabot 2009 award and Ortega y Gasset Prize awarded by Madrid's El Pais, said she was not seriously injured and was released half an hour after the arrest. "I am still really affected by all of this, but it is not going to stop me from writing my blog," Sanchez said. Cuban authorities say Sanchez and all other political dissidents are "mercenaries" in the pay of the United States and other western nations.
Classic albums like Nefertiti, Sorcerer, and Miles in The Sky soon followed and established the quintets’ reputation for pushing the boundaries of jazz into new territories. Chord structures were being left behind as they played in a “free” form style and in 1968 electric keyboards and guitar were added to Miles’ sound palette for the first time. More changes in personnel occurred on two key releases in 1969. In A Silent Way not only brought guitarist John McLaughlin into the music, but keyboardist Joe Zawinul as well. In a Silent Way was an electric album, with the tapes heavily edited later by producer Teo Macero, and it helped point the way for the full blown jazz- rock fusion of Bitches Brew.
The scene in and around Asheville NC is pretty spread out. There is a healthy indie rock scene, a small but good punk/hardcore scene, hippie jamband scene, Bluegrass/old timey/country scene. Some of the local Asheville, NC acts that should not be missed are The Reigning Sound, Electric Owls, Lovett, Matt Evans, Do It To Julia, Mimi Bell, Ice Cream, The Honeycutters and Floating Action
I want to just write about who MATTHEW ISAIAH is….there are so many WORDS that describe and have become Matthew. He is a MIRACLE…when he was born his prognosis was the cardiologist did not think he would make the 15 min drive to the other hospital. He was that sick. His heart defect was so bad (obstructive) and his lungs were so bad…he was a blue baby. After his 8 hour open heart surgery when he was 8 hours old, at 5 days old being taken off the ECMO (heart lung bypass machine) to ‘die a natural death’…the MIRACLE that when almost 24 hours after being taken off and given the grim news that he would not make the night, he is awake, wiggling toes, grabbing our fingers and not as BLUE as he was on day 5!!! And day after day of those first 98 days in the hospital, proving doctors wrong….doctors never able to give a prognosis or tell us WHAT to expect because at every turn, GOD thru MATTHEW would prove them wrong or do the complete opposite!!! He pulled out his vent a couple of times during those days and during all the drama that that caused he would sit up and SMILE such a big beautiful smile and the RTs, nurses and drs would just MARVEL that he seemed to KNOW when he was ready to be off the vent and do AMAZING….of leaving the hospital WITHOUT a trache and a vent that they drs wanted him to leave with because he would ‘not grow’ because of his rapid breathing….going home and doing AMAZING until he was 5 months old and started SEIZING and given a diagnosis of INFANTILE SPASMS and being told to ‘video tape what he was doing at 5 months because he may never do anything more than that’….another miracle when INFANTILE SPASMS didn’t materialize and SHOCKING the neurologist because in all his 20+ years of practice he had NEVER had a pt diagnosed due to the earmark TYPE of seizures and not progress and continue with the infantile spasms…He is so STRONG…stronger than ANYONE can be…he has just been such an AMAZING little boy….thru all the hour/2 hour long seizures where he has to be rushed by EMS, being intubated, being poked, being bagged because he stops breathing…hospitalizations due to all his seizures, his respiratory condition (he has CHRONIC LUNG DISEASE)…ALL his numerous illness here at home where he is on and off oxygen, oral steroids, antibiotics, 6+ nebulizer treatments a day and being suctioned and just recently, he is now having to wear a CPAP machine while he sleeps and just being such a TROOPER and not fight it and just ACCEPTS IT…that is something that is sooooo STRONG about him…he will be getting a blood drawn, getting suctioned, getting some procedure done, a sleep study with all the wires on his head, being messed with medically and thru it all, he might be crying but he doesn’t FIGHT….he does pull away, he just cries and doesn’t fight…it is just so amazing to see him be so strong…it breaks my HEART because I know it is because he has been thru soooo much that that this is ‘normal’ is why he is like he is…the medical staff are just in awe of him because I will hold his arm down and he won’t try to kick, punch or anything else, he will just cry and if I have my phone out or something is distracting him, he won’t even CRY while getting a blood draw….my beautiful baby boy has been thru so much that it is just something ‘normal’ for him that he just accepts it…and when he is done……HE SMILES!!! This big beautiful SMILE…what a miracle and blessing this little boy is in our family….we NEVER keep him home when we are out and about…he goes with us EVERYWHERE…we take trips as a family….enjoy RVing….parties….normal everyday stuff like groceries, church, everywhere…..we are so PROUD of him and we are so IN LOVE with this little boy…he brings so much light in our lives and so much JOY!! To remember everything he has been thru, to remember how CLOSE it was that he was ALMOST not going to be a LIVING part of our lives…..we embrace, feel blessed, & are THANKFUL for every second and give PRAISE to GOD for this little miracle in our lives.
This will be March/April next year (date to be finalised) on a Tuesday in Exeter (sorry, Tuesday is the only day the venue is bookable for most of the day).
Juliana
...and many more!
She glanced at the group. Clockblocker, Kid Win, Vista, and the girl from the Endbringer fight who called herself Flechette.
"Reformed Pastor" - disciple every individual!
What's the Goss?
Still, I highly recommended THIS AIN'T NO DISCO if only for those wild anecdotes and recollections regarding the general mayhem that was coming outta not only New York, but the world at a time when it seems as if the powers that be had temporarily lost control of something that was within their iron grip for a longer time'n any of us could imagine. And hey, hardly anything's been left out in this 'un, from the early days of bitter struggle through the Patti Smith residency and Summer Festival to even the infamous Wayne County-Handsome Dick Manitoba kerfuffle which got the club covered in such magazines as THE WEEKLY WORLD NEWS! It only goes to show you that Kozik was smart enough to cover most of the bases which even suits a guy like myself who wants to know every pertinent anecdote and group sound that came outta the place like yesterday!
And sometimes we could pray,
* Newconquista of the New World
When he speaks of that night the only visual reminder is the long, eight-inch scar etched down the left side of his neck. He has come a long way from that weakened 17 year old boy in intensive care who twice stood on death’s doorstep. But if Dan had learned anything from baseball it was this: it takes three strikes to get a batter out, and his best pitch was yet to come.
For dessert we order the prettily named Aseana sunrise, a cold pumpkin pudding made with coconut milk. The pumpkin flavour isn't as overwhelming as we'd initially anticipated, almost tasting like mango.
Movement: Not yet... Hopefully SOON!
Crucially, though, they weren’t just assuming that some other massive body must exist out there, because the theory just had to be true. They were refining the theory, adding new elements to it, and in so doing they made a new prediction, by which they could test whether the new version of the theory was any good. Theories do that. If it can’t predict specific future observations, it ain’t a theory. And in this case, the Newtonian model of the solar system predicted a new planet of a specific mass, in a specific place, with a specific orbit.
ü The equipment can confirm that metal detected is rejected There is no this function, but counter will show you how many products was rejected
There are also some limitations:
Speak to the Sky
Brulee relaxed from a tension she hadn’t realized was there until Lakosha settled her fears. “Then what has brought you to me?”
When Smith's defense counsel filed a motion to suppress the evidence based on
I touched one of those pillars and I could feel all of the energy of every person who had touched them before me. They vibrated with life and history and were proof of the incredible will of the human creative spirit! Cities speak to me and they say, on behalf of all humanity, Look at what we've done! Look at what you can do!
Debbie did try to sort of cheer herself up, she said, “I know, it’ll happen one day.” I couldn’t offer her any encouragement. That “one day” can turn into a year and then into decades. All I could tell her was that the sadness about being single comes in waves. It’s not always really intense.
"Water" by The Sugarcubes
Are you providing training to your applicators for different products for effective work?
Waterbury (CT) Republican-American, 2005-02-02
one atom of light
She was in her early to mid twenties with beautiful long blonde hair down to her waist.
It means that there is no excuse anymore. If IBM can do this with 200,000 people so can you.
But the Fishers make harsh demands of their members, and Dorry must make greater and greater sacrifices. In demonstrating her devotion, Dorry finds herself compromising her grades, her job, and even her family's love. How much is too much? And where will the cult’s demands end?
I sometimes wonder if it's partially due to the fact that I have too much on my plate to spend the time stewing and stressing about things for very long the way I was once prone.
On the other hand, I’ve also tried to be painfully honest and opened up about some deeply personal stuff that I’ve also been commended on.
Even though Obama's Justice Department got charges dropped against two thugs who broke federal law by intimidating voters at a polling place in Philly, it appears that this honeymoon is also over:
What strikes me in the case of the two children I mentioned is that an EpiPen and Benadryl weren't administered. In the case of the little boy, 911 wasn't called and he went to the hospital with his mother, rather than in an ambulance.
Since when did John start carrying a knife?
1) 70 Willow Street, in the popular Greek revival style of the day, was built in 1839 by Adrian Van Sinderen, the descendant of original Dutch settlers in New Amsterdam and a fiery Revolutionary War-era reverend from Flatbush, Ulpianus Van Sinderen. Van Sinderen's lavish urban villa -- it has almost a dozen fireplaces -- is one of the oldest houses in the neighborhood, but not the oldest. There are a few neighboring houses that are older, including 24 Middagh Street, just a couple blocks away and built in 1824.
Before now, I don’t think I would have put “I made” and “quilt” in the same sentence. I have had a desire to learn to sew for a while now, but making a quilt was not on my radar.
This is the secret to silky and lump-free gravy, folks. First, have your tools ready. You need a whisk. Don't have one? Buy one! We're going to make a "roux", which is equal parts butter and equal parts milk. I use whole milk. Non-fat and low-fat is a no-no. I mean, really? It's gravy, people. It's a holiday, so enjoy and work out later. Yes, there's cognac in this shot. I wanted to make a batch of gravy with cognac in it, and another batch with a splash of apple cider vinegar. Measure out the flour and milk (6 Tablespoons flour, 6 Tablespoons unsalted butter) and 1/2 cup whole milk. Have the stock nearby, and start melting the butter. Get your whisk ready. Thank you to my husband, who took these "action" photos so I could make this gravy with both of my hands.
According to the most recent Nielsen figures, those 212 Million on-line Americans spend an average of an hour a day on-line. Further, they are on any given web page for about…a minute. Where they are likely looking for something besides an ad.
Echo Parks dp
3. "He's way too much of a kn*b for that."
Saturday’s match against Norwich brings back memories of the first Premier League game at Highbury, one Arsenal were expected to win but ended up on the wrong end of a 2 – 4 scoreline. Their aim that day was as wayward as the parachutist who ended up in the North Bank building site. That sprang to mind because of the Arsenal On This Day posts which are upcoming. Today too is about beginnings and endings of an era, this time in 1974.
35Line after line my gushing eyes o'erflow,
“It may be that I lead the life I’ve planned for myself it may affect others; the effect may be no greater than the ripple caused by a stone thrown in a pond, but one ripple causes another and that one a third; it’s just possible that a few people will see that my way of life offers happiness and peace, and that they in their turn will teach what they have learned to others.”
The only thing I hate more than the sudden stoppers are the walking readers. Sometimes it’s not just books. I’ve seen people with huge open newspapers. Scream at them to “Look Out!” If this doesn’t get them looking up from their book or whatever, then trip them with a casual foot sweep. They won’t know what hit them. In fact, throw in walking Gameboyers with this group too. Hell, let’s add the walking Texters as well.
Lately I’ve been finding if I stop earlier, actually eat and get up and do something else for a while like go for a walk, I am more productive over all. I usually go to the Writing Shack at the bottom of the garden for the afternoon. I'm rubbish at doing anything after lunch if I stay in the house.
When she called home to say she had a boyfriend during her first year at McMaster University — where she was studying with the intention of going back to Africa — mom was thrilled.
Today, they arrived in the mail, and as awesome as they appeared, I started to sweat just from looking at them. Remember, it did get up to almost 90 degrees Fahrenheit, around lunchtime, so I was waiting for it to cool down a little bit before trying them on. So, I experimented with the Cardy socks, folded down the sides of the boots, and felt the soft sheep’s wool inside. And I also liked to see that really obvious label that said “Made in Australia” on the outside. Because as long as I’m getting them because I love things that are Aussie, and for the same reasons that an Aussie would, then I’m okay. There are still no fads for me. If you ever see me outside with these on, it’ll because I was too lazy to take them off (in the winter), when I went to check the mailbox.
Currently, I am working on my first fiction novel, a Sci-Fi/Fantasy/Paranormal Romance. Actually, I don’t know which category it will fit into right now, but that just about covers where I’m at right now with it. I finished my first eighteen pages of the beginning and had it critiqued in class a few weeks ago. I soon found out that I have a lot to learn about writing. I knew that going in, but it became glaringly apparent from the feedback I received from writers who have been at it a while.
It seems, however, that the left is not really concerned with the facts. What they are really focused on is power. Ever since Marx published his Communist Manifesto in 1848 -- well before that, in fact -- the left has sought totalitarian control over the means of production, and indeed over all aspects of human life. Modern-day practitioners such as Barack Obama know that the best way to bring about increased regulation, and thus control, is through the fiction of a crisis that can be addressed only by government.
Audience: I am an evangelical minister and 48%
Thank you all so much for your comments. I really appreciate them, and they're helping me out more than you know.
In January 2011, Chinese archeologists discovered something under the Great Wall of China, alien technology that was signalling to space…the coordinates, when seen via Hubble, indicates a massive fleet of ships making their way here., followed by a planetary object: Nibiru.
The dinning room is not finished. Still looking for the perfect table and chairs.
The solution; either get rid of them OR embrace the concept completely and include the following listed players in the squad for the Grand Final Replay this Saturday.
New in this week:
What a kick in the face for animal rights activists. Actually, what a kick in the face for millions of British animal lovers.
I can't resist sharing a few more nuggets from, "The Meaning of Trees": The "apple" that Eve offered Adam was more likely a quince. Wild apples have thorns and all cultivated apples, if left to go wild, will eventually start to grow thorns again. There was a brisk trade in the wood of the Myrrh tree long before Jesus, and Mary gets her name from the Hebrew, Myryam, after the Sumerian Marienna which was their word for the Myrrh tree. The Myrrh tree was the Mother Earth symbol for this culture prior to the arrival of Mary; so Mary is named after the Tree of Life. While these details are interesting for tree geeks (my kids are named after trees), kids will certainly enjoy the mythological stories shared in the compendium, like the one about why sugar maple trees turn red in autumn.
Next week's theme: Outside the Cardboard Box
03-Tell Me What to Call This
I blush “Who… let me guess Fishy?” He nods
Then there are the occassional NYTBR reviews that I just don't know what to make of. Troy Patterson (another television critic) reveiwed Mark Danielewski's new book, Only Revolutions, in yesterday's review. It should be said that Danielewski is not your average American novelist. He has been compared to Thomas Pynchon and Jacques Derrida - his novels are considered "modernist" or "postermodernist". While I would think he's trying to do more than tell a story, I don't think his inventive structure is designed as "a trap to catch reviewers," as Patterson figures. Right. Danielewski spent six years writing this novel to "catch reviewers." Only a paragraph above Patterson mentions that Only Revolutions has been nominated for the National Book Award.
08. Before I Forget
Full leisurely we glide;
When I had the regular job I had 4 times as much money. Yikes.
Saturday and Sunday,
Have you been stumped by what do to with all your digital photos? I hope this has given you some insight and inspiration to work with the way you think and recall memories while still accomplishing the goal of logical organization. Since the way we take photos today doesn't always end up in a box to store, we have to think outside the box when it comes to organizing. The gift of memories is that much sweeter when there is an organized system for retrieving and reliving those memories through our photos.
I Am Momma, Hear Me Roar! Cheri from I Am Momma blogs about her kids, ideas, and inspirations. You can find everything from hair tutorials to crafty awesomness to unique decor ideas, and somehow she manages to create most of it herself. She’s so talented and creative, and I would LOVE to have a stitch n bitch with her.
such things as fire and other unexpected events.
Secondary Signs of Ovulation Include, But Are Not Limited To:
(Note: this roughly translates to, “Your mother’s vagina”)
But when the Curse took over to the extent that he was unable to get out of bed, much less go to work, he had to look into treatment in order to collect disability to support his family. For more than a year and a half he spoke to therapists, doped himself up on their multitude of pills, and even went so far as to receive electroshock therapy.
jeweled casket of unshaped gold.
and her mama is at the end of her rope today too...i haven't been the same since i took that last bout of ear drops with the steroid in it. i've talked to nurses, doctors, pharmacists...all have told me i will fine and it will get out of my system...but i am loosing hope. i read about a woman online who had side effects for a YEAR after taking a steroid for a week. it appears i may be in the same boat. and i'm tired of being tired, angry, shaky, and cry-ey. i am normally a very vibrant, energetic person who is very happy. i feel like shit about half the time now...no energy and i cry at the drop of a hat.
You don’t have to have a blog to play along with the sketch challenge. If you upload your project to any on-line galleries or forums, please use the keyword of WMSC60. Better yet, why not upload it to your album in the Waltzingmouse Stamps Gallery?
I picture you with one arm as if to cross it across your chest, with your elbow rested on it so that you could reach to your head and twirl that hair. You were so funny about your hair. You kept it long for a while and then suddenly became friends with the clippers, buzzing it down short. In the past year you were getting it cut somewhere, though you would never admit where. It was a great game we had. Me pestering you about who had cut your hair, you claiming you had done it, complete with shaving your neck. Yeah, right.
So, you know how little bags of candy are sold in stores? I am descriptive challenged, but I will try my best. My mom always had a bag of those God awful round pink chalky candies that smelled like Pepto Bismol. I think they were called Canada Mints. Ok, so, up at the top of the packages of many candy bags there is a punched hole of sorts that is used to hang the bags in a line. And sometimes that hole still has the “chad” attached.
* the final regularly scheduled Art for Spastics show!
1 fronting
the only reason she is lying down here is because i told her too, but as soon as i go inside she will be at the barking again.
29th: 무적자 (Moo-jeok-ja/A Better Tomorrow, 2010) + Q&A with director
Oh and next Monday my darling boy will be 5(gasp), so we are taking him to Seaworld for the day, he's never been so should be lots of fun, then on the following Friday we will be taking him to Brisbane to have his finger operated on(he burnt it when he was 1), and have been waiting for 2years for the second op to straighten his finger properly, so now it's finally happening and there are mixed feelings (he's fine it's me that's a mess), but all should be well. Anyway sorry to rant, have a lovely day and I shall be seeing you soon xx
2. Introduction from RFH (1:09)
Soon…….
Something I've noticed about taking David (or Raine) on any walking path; He'll hang back so far that you're afraid you'll either lose him or have to take a nap waiting for him to catch up. Then, somehow, he seems to know when we've reached the halfway point and are actually heading back to the car. Then he'll be so far ahead of you it seems as if he's running ahead for help (help for him, or us we're never too sure about). We once walked along Slippery Rock Creek to Breakneck Falls in McConnell's Mill SP and he was taking soooo much time and being so very careful climbing over the rocks I started to feel sorry for him. But as soon as we turned around and headed for the car he was suddenly leaping from rock to rock with a grace that would put shame to a mountain goat. He reached the trail head while we were still 50 feet or so down the trail, despite being repeatedly called back to walk with us.
so scared that dan actually left work to come with us to the vet.
Amazon’s response to Random House’s move was stunning and swift:
You were a sleep around
When we lived in our cottage on Poplar Street, there was a continuous stream of cats that adopted our humble abode. Because I am extremely allergic to them, I never encouraged them to stay, but I soon realized that they couldn’t care less what I thought. So they came. They stayed long enough to be given names, then they left. My beloved often joked that we were part of some cat hobo network, and we must have received good ratings from the previous cats who lived with us. Great. Its one thing to be a good hostess to friends and family, but I really didn’t need the pressure of pleasing feral cats.
Hirsch does a fine job describing Willie’s role in race relations and the significant differences between Mays and Jackie Robinson. Some expressed dismay with Willie’s reluctance to “speak out” or fight about unfair treatment. But Hirsch gives Mays credit for just having focus on the game and showing through actions that African Americans deserved equal treatment. In the real world, not everyone is a fighter or an activist. But sometimes the quiet types can have just as much impact. I would venture a guess that Mays did as much to change people’s opinions about African Americans than did some who were more vocal about the injustices that existed.
Rioting also flared up near Qalandiya and Hebron, where mobs stoned Israeli security forces, burned tires and blocked roads.
1) Double Trouble
I don’t know about you, but both my grandfathers were in the US military during the gruesome WW1. My father, father-in-law, and only uncle were in a brutal WW2. Both wars were functions of colonialism; a 1%’s vicious and rapacious greed.
it’s just a dress rehearsal rag.
The entire population of Buchanan Dam is less than two thousand scattered around the shore of Lake Buchanan. Our subdivision consisted of five houses and wonderful neighbors. We took care of each other. We called on each other. We supported each other.
Inside his cavernous study, their father was sitting behind his mahogany desk. The messy stacks of books all around him made him seem oddly dwarfed, even powerless.
There are no good options. NASA could ask for a bigger overall budget, but in the current fiscal and political climate, Congress seems unlikely to grant one. I think we can live without the big SLS launcher, but Congress has mandated one and on a tight schedule. The JWST is another target, but a lot of money has already been spent, and it should be an amazing capability when finished. A commercial manned spacecraft is the fastest and cheapest way to restore U.S. access to ISS.
HAMUUL: Probably.
Okay, I admit it. The post before this one was a smoke screen, a weak attempt to convince myself that my relationship with Facebook was more akin to a giddy coffee date than a gluttonous multi-day orgy but orgy it was. I don’t actually linger there like a ne'er do well barfly but do check in possibly 20 times a day for a quick fix, a social bump, if you will. In my opinion, that’s over-commitment when there are other, more important activities to be done…like blogging (“Dear mom, I’m so sorry I made you look at that picture of those green cupcakes for so many days.”). So I’m solemnly swearing to fewer daily voyeuristic activities on Facebook and more engagement with the family, the pet, and the world around me in real time. I can do it. I can do it. I can do it.
Hernando de Soto is widely known for his expeditions,and his discoveries and is considered the first white man to see the Mississippi River. However in my research and reading the stories of his many conquest, I found that he was a vicious fighter, frequently raiding Native villages, killing or enslaving all in the way of his quest to discover riches. He would have the elders of the villages shot in open fields in execution lines, he made examples out of the warriors, placing them in chains, he also took many as slaves and guides on his expeditions. Most history books and educators will tell you of his brave struggles to explore. But in my reading and researching the subject of Hernando de Soto, I was quite surprised to see what a gold greedy and pitiless conqueror he was and his blatant mistreatment of the Native American Tribal People. Sometimes, he never even attempted to talk to them first, he would scout out their villages and attack without warning, pillaging for treasure.
What’s most impressive to me about JACKIE BROWN is not only the restraint that Tarantino shows but the professionalism of understanding what it takes to get this source material onto the screen. When he changes Leonard’s novel (RUM PUNCH), it’s done to respect Leonard’s approach and feel rather than to satisfy his own ego. As he’s quoted on the alternate sub-title track, Tarantino moves the story to LA from Miami because he doesn’t know Leonard’s Miami as intimately as the novelist does, but he does know LA as well as Leonard knows Miami, and that’s the only way he can keep the feel of the film authentic.
“Not What Happened” will be performed Saturday, April 28, at 8 p.m., at Mass MoCA.
So, I forwarded this email to spoof@paypal.com, and received a very suspicious reply! The phishers have taken over that email address as well!
When adverts come on the telly, they’re always louder than the program – why is that? If Mum or Jenny turn down the volume, it’s always random – I like to turn it down to 14 every time.
I'm having a tough time paraphrashing this one so I'll quote it directly:
Divide infused bourbon equally between two lowball or 6-oz glasses. To each glass, add 2 tsps of sugar and 1/2 of lime juice, and stir to dissolve sugar. Add tonic water until mixture fills 2/3 of the glass, then add ice cubes to top. Serve with mint or rosemary sprigs.
If you spoke to any of my friends they would tell you my stance on cheating is a very strong one. I’m extremely opposed to the whole concept of cheating in regards to relationships. There are several reasons why I have never agreed with any justification for cheating, and these reasons in turn have made me struggle to understand why people engage in such a harmful act. Let’s review some of the most common excuses for cheating…
Welp, my cute-loving-kind yoga instructor turned yelling drill-sergeant with no excuses last night during cycling.
Unload the crap in your brain. You don’t need to be an excellent writer. You can even draw out or illustrate your frustrations if that helps you.
“Embedding a customer service mindset” goes beyond outward appearances, masked employees, and careful placement of sanitary facilities. The mindset depends of values – shared values of company and employee. No trading of ideas, complaints, concerns? No engagement. After all if my boss does not care about my ideas/complaints/concerns, why should I care about his? Why should I engage our customers?
What I realise now is that Muesli is what you make it! It doesn’t have to be dry, flavourless and generally dull. I am a homemade Muesli advocate!
If you ever go to Charleston - you must stop by this breathtaking antique store!
End of Days by Eric Walters or The Eleventh Plague by Jeff Hirsch or pretty much anything with 'Plague' or 'Inferno' or 'Doom' or 'Death' or 'Buckets of Blood and Inordinate Amounts of Promised Adrenaline-Fueling Gobs of Violence and Cataclysm'. Or, as my eleven-year-old son says, "you had me at 'series of mysterious deaths leading to a deadly cat-and-mouse game!'" What can I say? He's my kid.
Yes, we have taken in refugees, we are good, charitable. people, and now we are paying the price for that charity. However, contrary to the impression which is given, until the human tsunami of the last forty years, the numbers involved were relatively small, certainly not enough to change the bloodline of a nation.
With David Duchovny as Batman, MyHeritage? I’d never really considered the idea of an all-female recasting of BF before, but it seems to have been on MyHeritage’s mind for a while. Let’s try the character…
Snow last night, thunderstorm during the night, rain this morning, sun this afternoon and now high winds and cloudy ....mmm... SPRING!!
Both articles are interesting, though I do see problems with both approaches. I can certainly follow Monica’s criticism of Mona as generalizing way too much, and not relating to the cultural differences in the various countries, but Monica’s approach to Mona is also somewhat problematic, basically casting suspicion on Mona and others like her (Monica mentions a number of women ‘informants’ in the article), especially with wordings like the second part of the title and sentences like stating that “by stirring up our sympathies and reinforcing our prejudices, individuals like Ms. Hirsi Ali and Ms. Eltahawy have climbed to the top of the media ladder,” hinting that they are doing this more to get sympathy and a good carrier, than based on a sincere wish to change the ME societies.
The bartender returned with Philip's glass, a purple liquid now within it.
the down was at first disappointing.
Oh, my sweet, sweet Jack. When he finally recovered enough to tell us about his day, it transpired that he had a great time. He had eaten all of his lunch, met lots of new people ("but I don't remember their names yet, Mum, only Will"), and had done sport ("I just did lots of running, Mum, but I didn't kick the ball"). Tomorrow, he has Art in the afternoon. His teacher told me he was terrific (so the tears were all mine, thankfully!) And it would seem after all the stressing, and the preparations, and the over-thinking, that my boy was ready for school after all (and exhale...)
Is back to the start
I didn’t yell. I didn’t start to panic. I didn’t even show cause for concern when she told me what she had done. I honestly had no energy left to snap. I couldn’t argue even if I wanted to. All I really felt at that moment was a hopeless sense of despair. I just wanted to get home, eat, unwind and put the day behind me. That might have been the longest and most emotional roller coaster car ride in my life. Food and sleep–that’s all I wanted.
Dress: Comma
5) Cover the dough with plastic wrap and refrigerate for 30-45 minutes. Preheat oven to 350F. Line two baking sheets with parchment/silpat.
“Just because it’s such a basic right for people and the fact that it’s not protected is kind of atrocious,” said Kaylin MacNeil of Holyoke.
I would like to believe,
The Abyss of theAbysmal Calendar coincides with the Winter Solstice (Southern Hemisphereans, you’re on your own), the longest night. This is the brink from which we return to begin the new year. It is also linked with the North, which is the cardinal direction associated with Winter as well as the land of the dead.
He purposely doesn’t explain things and purposely doesn’t know the answers – and he accepts that not everyone likes this aspect of his writing. But he maintains that there is stuff in life that can never be explained or neatly wrapped up and to do so seems false.
The other notable aspect of the sidepods are the exhaust bulges. These stick out prominently on the flank of each sidepod. They don’t serve an aerodynamic function themselves, but simply fair-in the final 10cm of exhaust pipe. This final section of exhaust is now strictly controlled by the regulations. Its position must sit within specific area, it must point upwards between 10 – 30 degrees and can point sideways plus or minus ten degrees. McLaren have fixed the exhaust in the lowest most rearwards position possible, the tail pipe then pointing steeply upwards and inwards. From the limited view it would appear to direct the exhaust plume towards the outer span of the rear wing.
Because my photos pool is running low -I have decided to take a break until early next year when
spring pours forth her song
5.) Alvin Cash – “Twine Time” (Chicago Soul) Big instrumental hit in 1965
Bake for 20-22 minutes. Enjoy!
Paul always manages to write such interesting posts when he blogs, but with my flowers I struggle to think of anything to write, I'm just getting over a nasty bout of the flu at the moment which probably won't help my blog writing.
The right of the citizens to keep and bear arms has justly been considered as the palladium of the liberties of a republic; since it offers a strong moral check against usurpation and arbitrary power of rulers; and will generally, even if these are successful in the first instance, enable the people to resist and triumph over them." -- Supreme Court Justice Joseph Story
It was tough having to look around the crowded dining room at the faces of those who had supported the concept of our Beer Dinners and the handful of new faces who had only recently discovered them – people who, six years ago might have taken a bit more convincing to take a punt. It was a difficult task to tell them of the sale and that this would be the last Beer Dinner at The Courthouse.
Silence stretched out between them as Pevan tried to figure out how to extend the conversation. These were real answers she was getting, real progress, but was it enough? Would a Gift-Giver be able to explain Talerssi? It sounded like a place name, despite the fact that the Wildren never named places.
FTK is, without a doubt, For The Kids; but it is also so much more than that to me. FTK is a family. We work hard to reach our goals, and we work harder to make sure the Kids are taken care of. We get frustrated, sad, happy, and mad sometimes in the time span of only one meeting. But I guarantee that if you asked any person in FTK if it was all worth it, they would say “yes.” This past year in FTK has been amazing in more ways than one and I honestly cannot wait to see what these next few years will entail for such a driven, outstanding group of people. That being said, I would like to thank everyone in FTK for giving me a memorable first year of college. It’s sad to see some of you go because I feel like I had only a short time to get to know those of you that are graduating but I wish you the best success and happiness as you move on.
One of the key concerns mentioned in the document is the extension of involvement in the Nile Basin Initiative beyond the state – that is, to include a wide range of society. In the process to date, and the wider construction of new political environments, the main actors in the NBI have worked at the state level. Two key issues arising out of this process are first, how to incorporate the visions and beliefs of society at all levels within this wider basin vision in order to ensure that ownership has both depth and breadth; and second, how to ensure that non-state, civil society actors also have a voice in the kinds of program that are being established.
Some of us are ‘loners’ either through choice or circumstances, but I don’t think that we were ever meant to be by ourselves, that we ‘operate’ better in a social context if we are not without any links.
Why, well it’s simple really, on the way to VIE from Gatwick last Monday, alarms went off in a Virgin Airbus that had just departed Gatwick bound for the States, it had to make an abrupt about turn and return when the detectors indicating there was smoke on-board and it triggered a full scale incident, complete with a priority landing and emergency chutes and all.
¼ cup sugar
Thanks, Price family, for your support.
2:30AM: Still nothing. Still sitting on the steps in the rain. A glimmer of hope– I saw a raccoon run across the street.
08. Shaved Monkey
While many of the big and successful companies today were established by a single founder or a family, Woolworths began as a corporation from the very start. In fact it actually offered shares to the public which wasn’t fully subscribed. Yet there were five founders who gave the company its start: Percy Christmas, Stanley Chatterton, Cecil Scott Waine, George Creed, and Ernest Williams. These names are not that recognizable today.
I was really amazed after I made a much deeper analysis of the activities carried out by Canadian transnationals in Latin America. I knew about the damage caused by the Yankees to the people of Canada. They forced the country to look for oil by extracting it from huge extensions of sand that are impregnated with that fluid, thus causing an irreparable damage to the environment of that beautiful and extensive country.
Fitzwilliam Darcy, Gentleman series by Pamela Aidan--read 0 out of 3 (series finished) Pride & Prejudice from Darcy's point of view.
5) Pools
Yes. I did it. I sent the message. I figured ‘what the hell’. I’m fond of saying ‘if you don’t ask the question the answer is always no’. So I sent the message.
I even got a couple of movies from the Red Box since Mr Shabby had taken my beloved lap top with him so I couldn't watch Netflix whilst working on my matchboxes in bed (I love doing things like this at night).
That may be.
In the last few days, I did a big deposit from checks coming in from the last few weeks between birds nest, 147 stuff, coffee sales, and the give-a-way through paypal, etc. I have added $1475 to our account. Thank you, Jesus!
Now it's just me. Not that I don't have the emotional support of my parents and family, but I have a tenacious need to handle everything on my own. It's an honor and an obligation to myself. As exciting as it is to be on my own, it's also scary at times. When you only have yourself to answer to, there are times when that's even harder than justifying your actions and decisions to someone else. My money will last (or not) for as long as I allow it to. When you have someone else in your life, it's easy for the two of you to justify something like poor spending decisions. If I save my money, I feel that sense of pride by myself. If I stretch myself to the point where I have to make $10 last three days, I am alone in that stress.
So with a spring breeze blowing through my curtains, I got to work boiling noodles and making the cheese sauce, a delicious combo of Romano, cottage and cream cheeses, garlic, crushed red pepper, fresh basil and egg.
I got home and took a bite. It wasn’t bad. It actually had a taste to it. I was pleased. This could be something else to work into my new diet.
With these “marriages,” the women get a five-year social pass and the “husbands” get between RM3,000 and RM5,000 as well as a monthly allowance of RM500 to RM2,000 for their troubles.
“After more than forty years in the publishing trade, our founder established Janus Publishing Company in 1991. We currently publish more than forty titles a year, many by previously unpublished authors.”
The events are actually kind of fun, although I believe it won’t last for long. Remember how last year we got all excited about the new book event concept? That concept just pissed me off later on because Nexon overused it. I fear they’ll do the same for this event, which is a board game!
It’s just as icky too.
“silence is what I crave,” he screams.
I didn’t know who this guy was, but ifelt safe.
Leaving bright shining metal
Example: Type 1 Sugar Addict questionnaire asks-- Do you feel tired much of the time? Do you need coffee to get jump-started in the morning? Are you working more than forty hours a week? And so forth. Simply tally your score and determine if that is your type. If not, move on to the Type 2 questionnaire. It is important to note, that it is possible to have more than one type of sugar addiction, and many will find this to be the case.
*The almonds insisted they were actually the ones who initiated by looking at me, then looking away, then looking at me again, and that I totally fell for it hook, line and sinker.
Having an agent is not absolutely compulsory and there are some types of writer who rarely have agents. Many poets don't have an agent, and most writers of children's non-fiction don't have agents, for instance. Academic writers don't usually have agents. These types of writing don't earn much per title and so an agent won't be interested in representing them. Nor should you be interested in giving away 15% of very little when an agent won't get you a better deal. Children's non-fiction is often written for a flat fee and, indeed, having an agent can put some editors off signing you - they don't want the aggro of dealing with someone who will try to argue about what is a standard deal; it's simpler just to employ another, unagented, writer.
You will also notice the smaller condensed version of the data sheet. I made a new excel worksheet where I can track the entire week and then the weekly totals all on one sheet.
The bullying stopped. Gradually, but after word got around that I was taking less shit than before, it cut off sharply and just kept on diminishing.
I think if I was reading these issues as they were being released, I’d feel the storyline was wanting. But now, it’s been more than a decade since it’s been out, and discussed ad nauseum. There’s a certain mystique to it. And the creators have talked about how they wanted Doomsday to be this force of nature. This unstoppable unknown. But I still want to know more. Maybe later they give the answers.
I am also a writer and a reader and a lover of beautiful books. I sometimes buy books without ever having the intent of reading them. I buy them simply because they are beautiful, or clever, or creative, or whatever.
Some books are just works of art in themselves. This is the case of Star Guitars: 101 Guitars that Rocked the World by David Hunter ($35.00, Voyageur Press, imprint of Quayside Publishing Group). It is a large format book with 288 pages filled with 600 color photos and 100 black and white. The author is a musician and journalist, co-author of the Totally Interactive Guitar Bible, and a couple of other books on the subject, so his knowledge is encyclopedic. This book is an illustrated history of the actual guitars of the stars that made the music; people like B.B. King, Eric Clapton, Stevie Ray Vaughn, and many others. Jimi Hendrick’s 1968 Stratocaster sold at auction in 1993 for $1,300,000, so we’re talking some very serious guitars here. If there is someone you know who loves guitars, this one is a Christmas-keeper!
On my gypsy I placed two tags on the screen and the I flipped on over and matched them up... then I welded them together... the size on the gypsy screen said 3.50w x 11.39h. After I cut it out in red... I placed a pink piece of card stock in the middle and trimmed off the edges.. and glued it down...
I really like the idea of being able to remove these sheets and keeping them for reference
I decided to go with shades of purple and green for this Christmas card. I colored the image with Copics, then added some gold glitter to the stars. The designer paper is from the Lilac Avenue Collection by Kaiser.
He is such a hoot also with the things he says to me. I get sent to time out for not getting to his every need. I get told that he is in charge and of course the " I love you mommy Soooo much"
We find in the quran such verses as tell muslims to fight people for the simple reason that they do not believe in islam or because they reject islam eg 9/29 etc. The story of solomon is same, he finds out about sheba people who worship sun and tells them to convert are I will destroy you. So they decided to convert.
Short stories are the next level up from flash fiction. I’m going to talk about short stories in detail later on. I’m still not prepared for that post, which is why this one’s here. (And this one is late, I know. I haven’t had a second of spare time in weeks.) But please, if you love reading, read short stories. It’s something I have to make myself do. I like books. I sometimes forget short stories exist, and that they can be just as powerful. But I can’t forget that. Like flash fiction, it’s another lesson in brevity. Can you write a full story that draws readers in, provokes an emotional response, and carries readers on an imaginative journey given only a few thousand words?
I hope everyone had a chance to check out last week's Challenge Me Monday post because we said "goodbye" to some of our Design Team (DT) members (sadly). I will personally miss the girls that I have been working with, some of them for multiple terms! This group of women are truly fantabulous and I feel so incredibly blessed to have gotten to know them personally and am lucky to call them my friends. Ladies, you will be greatly missed! :(
your wandering sundrenched oh so relaxed
First stop will be 10 days in Ukraine. 3 of those days I will spend with Mask and Kitten in Pripyat exploring the mecca of abandonments. Whilst in Ukraine there will be other outings to abandoned wonderlands that people have left to decay over the years. When our time is up there I am going to Belgium to drink beer and eat chocolate. when not drunk, hungover or on a sugar high I will take my camera out and visit the many of the wonderful abandoned buildings that Belgium has to offer.
I had
Only a day and a half left and there are 2 nights in that day and a half. I may get through this with some sanity intact.
Double TeamMega Man Action Network 5: Double Team
.....Making the snacks.
Let’s look at one example – meals. Some of us are very habitual in our morning meal. The Englishman says, “Every morning, I eat an egg with toast and I drink a cup of coffee.” But, his Japanese counterpart says, “Every morning I am eating (“tabete imasu”) and egg with toast and am drinking (“nonde imasu”) a cup of coffee.”
“Wait.”
Disc Nine (2008): “Return”
Left: Cover by Jack Cole
And perhaps Britain's most famous conservative thinker of the 19th century, who was also one of her most notable Prime Ministers, was Benjamin Disraeli (already mentioned above). It is he who is often credited with creating the modern British Conservative party and he certainly had a large role in causing his political party to be known as the Conservative party rather than the Tory party. He was a constitutional traditionalist, a great monarchist and imperialist and was responsible for declaring Queen Victoria "Empress of India". Yet he was a great friend of British working-class people too -- extending the vote to them in 1867, bringing in legal limits on how many hours per day they could be asked to work, limiting the age at which they could start work, bring in health regulations and for the first time giving some legal protection to labour unions. He saw his duty as Prime Minister as: "to secure the social welfare of the people." He saw his guiding principles as being not only to "maintain the institutions of the country" -- which he saw as an essential barrier to tyranny -- but also "to elevate the condition of the people". And despite often being accused of megalomania and mere opportunism, he refused both a Dukedom and burial in Westminster Abbey.
I was ignoring the day as it drew closer. I don’t feel like I’m old or anything like that, I’m just surprised at how big the number is. When did that happen?
When that day comes, every person wearing a government badge of any kind will become a legitimate target, because the wearing of a badge has never given the person behind the badge the right to be judge, jury & executioner of any US citizen—without due process!
A few stops later, as we pulled into the 42nd Street station and the mother stood, the little boy took this opportunity to say “Goodbye and have a good weekend” to every single person he could. As they got off the train, the goodbyes continued with the passengers waiting to board.
This is probably a good thing.
Birthplace: Austria
"Why animal hats?" you might ask.
And it all reads like one long love story--for Ms. Flinn gets married in the middle of it, but obviously loves Paris as much as Hemingway, though in a very different way.
I thought rock week was so-so. It’s awfully hard to make rock music fit in with ballroom dancing. Did you like it? Leave me your two cents!
the same goes for 'never tease a weasle'
Signature cake (it features nuts as a layer; you can choose pecans, macadamia nuts, etc.)
Very nicely done with the CS Lewis paraphrasing. He's my favorite Christian apologist. As for your Rolex comparison, that's a very common apologist argument. Next, you'll be telling me about the wonders of the eye, etc. This watch maker argument has been debunked long ago. Anyone with even a basic knowledge of evolution and biology knows that it doesn't work the way you described with the factory and such.
Her plot is intriguing and the scenes are very steamy between Jane and Rhys.
Choose a wedding dress that will fit your best. Look for something that will make you confident and beautiful. Make sure that you will schedule fitting and will give time for the adjustments of your gown. Considering the body type when choosing wedding dresses will help you to go for the right one. For example, in case you have a large bust, it is recommended that you ought to go for low neck attire. These dresses will help to sleeker your looks while at the same time will assist to balance your body. This is because clothing will create an impression that you have a more compact chest.
7) How Long, O Lord? – D. A. Carson
"You mean attachment to an abstraction conceived as including the body of electors, other bodies giving rise to them, and numerous other elements, largely ideal?"
Because my visit there was part of the City 6 pack, I automatically got a choice of IMAX film, and even that wasnt easy to do! The one I missed out on, was Tornado Alley, which tempted me, because I suspected that at least some of it would be from Kansas. But the other one was set in the Arctic, and Alaska, so alright, that won out.
2) Badge
Today I feel inspired and I would like to write about the stuff I got while I was in London. Every year this city became more amazing :) Due to the proximity of the Olympic Games, every place in town was in works. That was truly annoying because they were ruining the views a lot... :( but anyway, it's always exciting to visit London no matter what.
If you are a tele-worker or running a business, business broadband packages can give cutting edge over your competitors. It is not just the speed, but the less contended line and other key features like unlimited email addresses, domain name, web space and more secured connection can make a huge difference. You need not worry about per minute charges with broadband connection because you will pay fixed monthly charges. These monthly charges depend on the service that you have chosen. If you go online on regular basis and for long hours, broadband will become cheaper than dial-up which is charged for the time spent online. The broadband plan basically depends on how much you download data in a month. Unless you download large files like videos or software, a basic package with 2 GB or 5 GB is quite safe. You can also select unlimited broadband package, if you want to download too much data.
Even now, after my contract has been settled, I still want to sell more books, which means I have to write them! Usually now when a writer is telling me their troubles, I sympathize, but I always ask if they're writing something new. If they're not, I tell them to start. Putting that hope into the future somehow fixes things. Focus on the writing—everything else falls into place when you do that.
I just got back my letter I wrote myself when I went on the woman's retreat this last spring with Salem Heights (we write letters to ourselves, and they are sent to us a few months later). It was an amazing weekend to spend with family and friends; learning that I am truly not alone. Here is the letter I wrote myself, encouraging words that are always good to hear...
attempting against Cuba’s
“But didn’t Jesus throw money-lenders and money-changers out of the temple in Jerusalem?” I asked.
Health Insurance Plan (SHIP and SHIP Plus).
“Your honor, it is my expert opinion and that of three additional consulting psychiatrists that the defendant, Lisa T. Bins, is unfit to stand trial.” I listened as the doctor who had tried in vain to question me over the past week droned on in front of the court.
4 mini portabello mushrooms
Captions for The New Yorker cartoon featured below are due TOMORROW before midnight.
Have you noticed that when you get to be an adult that you don’t stand still?
It's great if you have treasure maps prepped, who doesn't like a good prop? But, if you don't have anything prepped then you're up the creek without a... treasure map. I think it's weird that I've never come across anything like this before.
I read … a lot
US Dollar Index — 79.059
Dixie @ Gone Pecan alerted me to the fact that Lincoln was a D&D player, which is (sadly) something that clued me into knowing that I would like the guy!
I don’t remember this complete film and only checked it at high speed. There is also a peeing scene of a boy in tighty whities where a teen boy and girl coming into the bathroom.
Powerful controlling forces seeking to manipulate the worst terrorist atrocity in Europe of the 21st Century for different purposes within Norway.
7. The Greatest - Paramount Styles
The truth was rather less worrying – someone was making a zombie movie, but hadn’t bothered to tell anyone.
— When your team is defending, try to get players with the Recon class throw around some motion sensors. At the beginning of the round they can help you building your defensive perimeter. As the fight gets down to your camp, throw them around the stations. You will see enemies at your map moving, in the shape or three triangles pointing at the direction they’re moving at. When the enemy has thrown motion sensors, you can notice by a beep sound.
The storm clouds where melting in through his bedroom window and the acrid sulfur clouds where thickening under his door. He needed to run away, but couldn’t move.
I did some thinking, researching and googling and came up with the conclusion that the red lentils I used and did not soak and rise like I usually do were crossed contaminated with some other gluten-grain. I went back to the bulk package of red lentils that I poured from to make my soup. I usually take the time to soak and rise the lentils, but on this particular day I was in a rush to make dinner and just trough the lentils in the pot and stirred. I regretted that very much when I had a nice pot of soup that had been gluten-fied after it was cooked. I donated the soup to some friends that can eat gluten and rested and waited a few days for the reaction to go away.
ARTIST: Bob Seger
June at Dezinaworld is as anyone who knows a very loving and generous person. Due to the family turmoil of looking after her ailing parents she has decided to give her collages sheets away. She only asks that you don't overwhelm her and only ask for one a day but, come back as often as you wish. She will have buttons on her blog that supports charities of her choice and if you wish to make a donation that would surely please her.
I don’t know if anything will come of that brief brainstorm or if it will be lost in the overflow of ideas that come at us every day. But I know Kyle, and he has an excellent memory. If that was really a spark of inspiration in his eyes, he won’t forget. If he really wants to be a preacher, he’ll find a way to make his voice heard. And if one of these days Grandpa and his Nerd fill the pulpit together, I want to be there, right on the front row.
Da one arm jernts are kinda quiet.
The first time Megan tried to kill herself, she was in elementary school. By the time she was in middle school, she began to slip razorblades through her skin. Before she graduated high school, she manically shaved off her eyebrows. She refused to leave her bed for days at a time. She clung to friendships with people who did not exist. She had multiple suicide attempts. She developed a reliance on prescription drugs and an addiction to recreational drugs…
I’m not convinced that Americans tried particularly hard to follow the low-fat dietary advice. After all, Pollan chronicled in The Omnivore’s Dilemma the rise of fast food over roughly the same period, even claiming that there’s no animal flesh in nature with as much fat as a chicken nugget.
So that plot twist definitely grabbed me within the first few chapters. I had no idea how Helen and Lucas were ever going to end up falling in love when they start out wanting to kill each other! But as the intricate story unravels, things begin to make much more sense, as Helen and Lucas' Greek demigod pasts begin to catch up with them.
Thank you for your interest in the MLS System
first, i made the chocolate mustaches by melting a bag of semi-sweet chocolate chips in a double boiler. then, i let the chocolate cool slightly before putting it in a piping bag with a very small tip. (can't remember the exact size) once the bag was filled i piped the mustaches on a sheet of wax paper. for those of you that aren't well versed with the countless styles of mustaches, you might want to print some off the internet and place the picture under the wax paper to pipe over as a guide. once all the mustaches were complete i placed them in the fridge to harden.
The theme is CHICKEN RUN
Under Pressure
Anna ordered a kid's size peanut butter cup Friend-z. It took her almost two hours (not all at the restaurant) but she ate the entire thing. Allie inhaled her sundae. As Rich says, "Allie loves her ice cream." Like mother, like daughter.
(3)The report of expert evaluation; and
DOB: Use the date you are submitting the request to us as their birthday
Silva BM. Pregnancy during residency: a look at the issues. J Am Med Womens Assoc 1992; 47: 71-74.
i have many exciting things to report!
Come December everything started coming together. We had a date set for moving and all of the details in place. I wrote a new budget to insure I could make it financially through the new year without two jobs. Granite began to blow me away when he took easily to small crossrails and simple lead changes. I got a second round interview for a job.
A1: "I can, too."
By 3 pm it looked hurricanish.
Yields approx 16 2-inch square brownies, I cut the edges off so I only got 9 brownies
Tellingly, the UK has been excluded from the confidential discussions within the shady “Berlin Group” of Europhile politicians, spearheaded by German foreign minister Guido Westerwelle.
This project took me less than an hour from start to finish. It was really simple. I forgot to take a picture of it before I cut it all up...
But what would be really fun is taking Eric Ripert to, oh, I dunno -- Golden Corral. What is the French word for sneeze guard?
I wanted to try these cupcakes because I love S'mores and they are so comforting and it is getting cold here! I used the Perfectly Chocolate Cupcake recipe and made my cupcakes. I made sure to fill my cupcake liners only half full with the batter. The cupcakes baked a little over the top of the liner so next time I may try to add even less batter!
I bet you didn’t know that it has been known as the finest herb for enhancing one major aspect of feminine beauty, boobs (It is recommended to take 3g of fenugreek poweder/day to enlarge boobs!?) . It contains diosgenin (a compound similar to ostrogen), which has been found to promote the growth of new breast cells and increase the fullness of the breasts. This is, of course, not the only benefit fenugreek has (I just wanted to have your FULL attention!!). More important benefits include:
According to this source, a vegan diet includes all grains, beans, legumes, vegetables and fruits and the nearly infinite number of foods made by combining them. Many vegan versions of familiar foods are available, so you can eat vegan hot dogs, ice cream, cheese and vegan mayonnaise.
Sena: Friðrik Karlsson, Album with collaboration of Laddi, Savannatríó and Páll Rósinkrans, Steed Lord's début album "Truth Serum".
Today, I felt a settling into that summer pace, that realization that there is no need to rush, that much may be accomplished in the day that stretches out before me. So, I spent a good chunk of today with the book I'm still set on seeing published, In a World Made of Such Weather as This. Yep, I'm back to that long-winded title. It's what sticks to my heart. I spent a good bit of time yesterday reading it through and attempting to be critical of the order and presentation of the poems. I actually added back in four poems that I'd taken out a year ago, but the rest held together well. For what it's worth, this is the book as I see it.
So tell me how do you make Christmas about him?
Taken: 09/01/2008
And the people around him also nod in agreement when he says that Hazleton isn't like that anymore. There are cracks in the sidewalk, closed storefronts and blankness where downtown once lit up. Maddon says that even the traffic lights have dimmed.
I have moments in my life as a fat kid that left an imprint on me and will be there for my entire life like,
Beckett's dramatic works do not rely on the traditional elements of drama. He trades in plot, characterization, and final solution, which had hitherto been the hallmarks of drama, for a series of concrete stage images. Language is useless, for he creates a mythical universe peopled by lonely creatures who struggle vainly to express the unexpressable. His characters exist in a terrible dreamlike vacuum, overcome by an overwhelming sense of bewilderment and grief, grotesquely attempting some form of communication, then crawling on, endlessly.
ImagiNation tackles the subjects of creativity and mental illness and their co-mingling in a near-future and post-apocalyptic Britain, ravaged by a psychic virus, a world-changing disruption that causes dreams and nightmares to become reality.
Democracy is more than just voting. It’s thinking and debating and even arguing.
1300 S Springfield Ave, Chicago, IL 60623, USA
A large, woven basket with a lid, it contains everything that should be in the baby books, including photos and cards and locks of hair and post-it notes hastily scribbled with milestone dates.
Carol Fox is also the Designer you meet and greet this month in the magazine, and one othe items used in the feature is Her Steampunk Hat which was part of a larger Design team project Last year. The original article can be seen here and the hats used are available for purchase from the shop.
Regarding UV resistance and long term duration claims and comparisons, only time will tell, but I am fully happy with the quality of this non-OEM ink and the entire CISS system.
Slice off the crown and soak in mineral water.
Did you drive to work today? What if? As you pass a cell phone tower while driving down the freeway at seventy miles per hour, it falls over! No explosions, no workers, nothing remarkable: it just -- falls -- over…
You are seriously missing some important updated drivers!
‘No. When I’m in the hospital I just want to leave.’
Ok not really, but I'm gonna be pulling my hair out this week I am sure!
Eye shadow and lip gloss tubs
I found this necklace at a little open air market in Buenos Aires. I hope I get to go back there some day, especially now that I can call myself an Argentine tango dancer. But the main thing I want to go back there for is to make more unique wardrobe acquisitions!
Hello, hello.
I went looking and finally found one perched like a stone sculpture on top of a house near Lake St. Claire. My daughter informed me of the significance of the Snow owl to children's literature thanks to the Harry Potter series where they act as feathery postal workers delivering important messages. We agreed that my owl had a very Hogwartsian feel to it. Given the fact that this bird didn't budge for the hour I watched it is ample proof E-mail and texting has caught on with scholarly wizards and witches as well as more common place young people.
For me it was Emraan Hashmi who stole the entire show, with both his biting voice-over and the effortless ease in essaying the role of a helpless ‘intellectual’ director falling for a showgirl. I wouldn’t call him a great actor, but an underrated star whose screen presence and dialogue delivery can light up any movie.
Jill laughs and sits down next to me. Eyeing my slightly deflating dick she leans forward and takes the tip in her mouth, tonguing the little bit of cum off my cock. She then sits up and kisses me, wickedly pushing her tongue into my mouth. She has a small smirk on her face when she breaks the kiss.
175. Kris made appearance on the VCR at SNSD concert.
In other words, the fact that I don't feel good enough yet matters less than the fact that I keep trying. And the fact that I know I'm not great yet means that I do know what good writing looks and feels like--and that means that someday, if I keep trying, I may just get there.
At one point I was standing by myself on the perimeter of a big, wide dance circle. Ross was I don't know where. It was one of those moments when, surrounded by people, you just feel kind of lonely. You can sense the personal histories and the long friendships in the room, and since you are not woven into those histories yet, you stand, quietly, respectfully, at the edge of circles.
The good news is, you don't mind dealing with any of this because, afterall, at the end of the next 10 weeks, you'll have a sweet and tiny baby to love and hold. And that my friend, is where the trouble starts. You get that sweet and tiny baby in your arms and in the blink of an eye he will grow up and in 12 short months you will be at his first birthday party watching him cram cake and icing into every orifice of his face, and you'll think to yourself: "Where did my little baby go?"; "I miss having a tiny baby around"; you might even go so far as to think "I want another tiny baby... now". How, you ask, do I know these thoughts will go through your head? Because, silly girl, 9 months or so ago, you did just that thing after Adalyn turned one. While you wouldn't change being pregnant with Mason for one second, I just wanted you to have the opportunity to read this letter in about 15 months when Mason turns one year old, so you can rethink baby #3 so soon. I'm not trying to talk you out of baby #3 entirely, just reminding you that perhaps you should wait a while longer in between #2 and #3 so that you can have more patience and snuggle tolerance for Mason when he is Adalyn's age.
Shoot
DVD Catalog: 39225
Imagine that, I had to ask if there was someone there who thought they could be nice to me????? She was mildly miffed over the story of Erica and her job requirements but not so I thought that Erica might have a talk with her supervisor before lunch. It was more like "Oh...PAUSE....Ok".... And then she answered my question well enough to get me off the phone.
From that moment, I deeply respected a butcher’s good work as something that is not that easy to perform. So when I found Balzanelli Smallgoods, I felt like the miner finding a vein of gold. Ham in their workshop is made from good quality Australian pork, and this makes the difference. It is a philosophy: ‘I am committed to support local producers. I don’t want to see them disappear and see us, as Australian consumers, rely on imports!’
Improvements Planned (Check whatever applies):
I spent my lunch time in prayer for this boy. I turned to 2 Chron 6 where I read this on the sidebar of my Bible. "Others may doubt our sincerity, our passion and our purpose, but God, who looks beyond what others see, knows our genuine heart's desire." This made me think of our SW who felt that we were pursuing the boy only because we felt sorry for him and our desire to "rescue" him. While the fact that he was losing his chance for a family certainly played a part - it wasn't the only part. I had never felt a fire burn in me before the way a fire burned in me when I read that blog post about him. I knew I had to do something. The last phrase "our genuine heart's desire" also spoke to me since Psalm 37:4 (Take delight in the LORD, and he will give you the desires of your heart. ) was the verse I held on to during HJ's adoption.
Those who did the bullying should be held accountable.
TUESDAY MAY 4 2010 7 PM
I loved it!
until the next part...where i explore brooklyn and the meat packing district!
COST: Free admission.
Congratulations!!!!
The picture is probably not the best - it was a quick iPhone pic as I was packing up for the night but I just wanted to show you how much I have done this last week.....
I would like your thoughts on my acupuncture situation...
Understanding biblical typologies is important to further unfolding the Bible’s interpretation of the Church and its connection with Israel. Hans LaRondelle introduces biblical typology as “an institution, historical event, or person, ordained by God, which effectively prefigures some truth connected with Christianity.”[1] Typologies are not ever allegories or just symbols, because they “[predict] some actual realization”[2] that allegories and symbols alone cannot show. Each typology is made up of an Old Testament type and a New Testament anti-type that fulfills “the underlying redemptive and revelational process which [began] in the Old Testament.”[3] In other words, the Old Testament type points and is fulfilled by the New Testament anti-type. The best way to begin to understand typologies is to examine basic typologies in scripture. Romans 5:14 explicitly states that Adam “was a type of the one [Jesus] who was to come.” Here, Adam is the Old Testament ‘type,’ and Christ is the New Testament ‘anti-type’. 1 Peter 3:21 connects the flood with baptism and shows how the salvation of Noah through the ark points towards the New Testament baptism in Christ. Both are clear situations in which the Old Testament type is a shadow of the New Testament anti-type that is the preordained fulfillment. Another example is Hebrews 7:15 in which Christ “arises in the likeness of Melchizedek” in such a way as to draw parallels between them as historical persons that share a kingly priesthood. Thus, the basis for typological study is the conviction that the New Testament sheds light on and fulfills the Old Testament scriptures. However, there are clear limitations and various debates on how far typologies can be taken. One cannot merely make up correspondences between the Old and New Testament scriptures without careful exegesis and responsible limitation. Hans laRondelle concludes that typological interpretation must be approached as follows:
After looking at the clothes, I started exploring the site and discovered their Fall 2010 Look Book. Wow again. Beautifully styled and photographed, the look book feels like a mature-but-still-hip J.Crew--skinny jeans, red pumps, statement necklaces. Très chic.
1 margaret
I reviewed this book almost a year ago, and it's worth another mention. This was one of my favorites as a child and remains a popular one in our house. As a kid, I loved the language and repetition. As a mom, I love that it exposes my kids to places and people different from themselves. Check it out from the library and see if it isn't one you'd want to add to your home collection.
in purity and sweetness of tone and exquisite modulation they are
I get chill bumps typing this. Literally. For some of us, there's nothing more sacred than taking reality, in its boring, irritating, confusing, prickly manifestation, and describing it so carefully, in such a craftsmanlike way, that it becomes fascinating: a thing to hold the attention of even the most jaded reader. Anything can be interesting if you take the time to find out its secrets and complexities and then describe those so others can realize them, too. Lots of work, but amazingly rewarding for those of us who love it. Think how much easier it would be, though, just to make it all up and steal some words from someone famous.
I have been reading a lot of late about what is known as the “Manosphere”. For the un-initiated, the Manosphere is basically a movement among modern men who have worked out the best strategies to pick-up women (usually in the form of no strings sex).
Alas, the 2 hours of beer drinking came to an end at 8 and the brilliant plan of eating hamburgers at Casino El Camino was hatched. An hour wait did not dissuade us from the need for delectable cow between bread. We happily grabbed some beers and met interesting folks also priming themselves for SXSW. The place was packed, and the wait was worth it.
Here's a bit of The Hunger Games (picked at random):
The person's usually not at the height of their fame when I honor them, especially if they've died of old age. I've memorialized old movie and TV stars that Paris Hilton has never heard of, and Larry King has probably forgotten. Speaking of movies and TV, most people associate each with the actors that appear in them. However, I feel what goes on behind the camera is often as important as what happens in front. To that end, I've honored director Arthur Penn (Bonnie and Clyde) and writer Larry Gelbart (TV's MASH.)
Wikipedia defines a virus as “a small infectious agent that can replicate only inside the living cells of organisms”. The use of viral terminology to describe the movement and sharing of online content is very apt. However, whilst science has given the phenomenon its name, the question persist as to whether or not it has truly ‘gone viral’ in online video.
Saul, the man whom is now called Paul, the Apostle of Christ, also taught that man is to keep the Feast of Unleavened Bread.
5 CHILDREN living in poverty are three times more likely to suffer mental illness than children from wealthy families.
no no no no….
Municipalities will not be giving services to government offices or holding public office hours today, streets will not be cleaned and garbage will not be collected. Israeli settlers largely back the housing protests but are wary of left-wing slant.
3 ¾ flour
Please apply in writing, enclosing a CV and a covering letter stating your suitability for the post, to katy.fox@traplet.com or Craft Stamper Magazine, Traplet Publications, Traplet House, Pendragon Close, Malvern WR14 1GA.
I prefer to use natural lighting. This can be done in a well-lit area of your own home, in your yard, or at a favorite park. I find that the familiar, homey settings create even more meaningful portraits for your walls.
In the hallway is a poster. The understated graphic lends guts to the words, "It says more about you than you'd ever say about yourself." Words of comfort to a boy whose father always said, "You can't do anything right" and a mother who complained, "Nothing makes you happy." I'll be a Green Beret and everything will change.
There is a lot going on here. First, the people leave God to follow their desires and corrupt the church leadership (Aaron) into following them, threatening Aaron with lack of relevancy if Aaron doesn’t help them fashion a new god, made from human hands. God is angry and is inclined to wipe everyone out and start over, but Moses reminds Him that the Hebrews are His chosen people. God then gives the Hebrews a second chance (repeat) and sends Moses with the Testimony to teach the people how they should behave as citizens of the Kingdom. It is then Moses who gets mad, who then destroys God’s word. God calls Moses back to the mountain and says, essentially, “No, you are going to deliver to the people My Word.” God reminds Moses that it was he (Moses) who broke the tablets, not the people (“…first tablets, which you broke.”). God then gives Moses (and by extension, the people) a second chance, repeats Himself, and re-writes the Ten Commandments.
So what stated out as a near disaster turns out to be only a minor irritation due to the help of my awesome co-teacher and and a landlord who either felt sorry for me or is simply an overachieving neat freak.
JT - So why then is there this outcry against Rangers, that they must be punished, that they must be sent here, that they must be banished to the dungeons of Scottish football…
You are wrong to assume that I would have sympathy for your client. When we gorillas break wind, our gases are quickly diffused in the atmosphere and cause minimal aggravation to our fellow creatures. The practice of letting off in an enclosed space is wholly abhorrent to us. When I am inside a building, I do whatever I can to avoid such a calamity, including opening a window and positioning my backside to face outwards. Your client is obviously a reckless polluter who has no concern for the harm done by his obnoxious emissions. I must therefore decline your request.
and for glory to your people Israel.’”
Everybody knows the deal is rotten
worst of all will be the poem i have now committed myself to, entitle “From the Mouth of the Stars”. it is a multiple part epic that was spawned of a spontaneous poem that i expanded for a class assignment to write a multi section poem. it draws from multiple musical and literary influences, including the Woven Tide’s “From the Mouth of the Sun”, Brother Android’s “Scientific Satellite EP”, Bear in Heaven’s “Beast Rest Forth Mouth”, and a tall Phillip Glass of “Orion” that i was coming down on when i wrote the original poem.
d. Solution story:
there is so much controversy over this issue. All we know is that Luck and Griffin will be the first and second pick, but there is numerous discussions over how this will unfold. Many experts have weighed in, but it is now MY turn. So Here is my top five quarterbacks.
Cheers, Chicken
The Sun's ethos is centred on keeping the government on its toes and highlighting service-delivery problems, Moalusi says. "We tell the government: ‘This is what the readers are complaining about - and ‘if they are complaining about it, what are you going to do about it'... Our readers are well conscious of our power to get the government doing what it's supposed to do."
I Hope You Dance – Lee Ann Womack
I guess that is the reason I have not felt like writing recently. These thoughts have been churning and maintaining a less than stellar mood.
So why do so many people want to ruin this experience? So I have compiled a list of what not to do for you to print out as reminders.
Ginny Carter Smallenburg I am drawn to fabric, but haven't really tried that yet. I have done some bookbinding, but would like to become more proficient at it.
St. Thomas Aquinas
I am off to Suffolk for Jack's 7th birthday on 14th May. I'm really looking forward to seeing him and Kitty - it seems far too long since my last visit.
And I wish you wouldn't
“As for the fact that the decree on the heroic virtues of Pope John Paul II and Pope Pius XII were promulgated on the same day, this does not mean that from now on the two causes will be ‘paired’. They are completely independent of one another and each will follow its own course. There is, then, no reason to imagine that any future beatification will take place together”.
God used a thief to continue what he began in Eden. The Messiah must come. Jesus must be born in Bethlehem. Esau forfeited the birthright and God did not tell Jacob..”You need to return the birthright to the rightful owner. Give it back to Esau. I cannot work with this.”
3.) hope to visit my dad and step-mother in Santa Fe, with or without appendages.
Pictures can mislead. And, if a picture as they say is worth a thousand words, then it can mislead in a thousand words as well.
We could get to the same place, says the Center for American Progress, by imposing a paltry 0.2% surtax on the adjusted gross incomes of millionaires.
Mayors who have enrolled their communities in Let’s Move Cities and Towns are already making commitments to change their childcare programs, Mrs. Obama said, and she pointed to Omaha, Nebraska; Greenville, South Carolina; and Avondale, Arizona as places that have pledged to join the new initiative.
Aaaaaand.... when we came back, we found our house without electrical power....
It’s Mums and Dads,
We need to add furniture to my wish list.
Start a similar meme yourself!
Now this week we have gone colour mad and the theme is . . .
The last few weeks have seen Stupid spread even more, pushing the edges of mass hysteria and even getting Congress involved. This strand of Stupid is…well..simply stupid, and summed up in one word:
"Thank you Tom darling", she replied " I was so hoping you'd say that.... Hurry home, there is so much to do. You'll see, this spring, it will be good again"
I am aware
So let’s skip ahead to see what one lawyer representing the plaintiffs has to say:
But I digress. Digression is my favorite form of exercise.
I’ve heard these questions from friends and in Bible studies, and I’ve asked them myself. “How do I know it’s God and not me?” seems to be a question every Christian asks himself at least once on the journey.
and learn from them
The curtain closed. Janet gazed in the mirror. The sapphire had fallen to just the right spot on her chest. If only it really were magic! She’d try anything to avoid looking lame at the ball. Maybe she should wish she didn’t have to go. That she could go back to Boston. That her parents were still alive.
"I naked!" (very popular saying)
Then she brought folic acid into the picture.
Come and visit us at:
Leave a comment for EACH child you donate to, to be entered to win. 2 comments = 2 entries.
Either way, this has made several things obvious and has led to a general clearing out of the Russian space agency's leadership, as well as a new drive for a better launch site than the worn out base in Kazakhstan. Baikonur cosmodrome is old, worn out and the Kazakhs, ever greedy for more cash but not business savvy enough to figure out when the game is up, are demanding yet more and more for the rent.
And suddenly I craving for Twisties, which very very weird for me.
Now I know that it can, I know that it did happen to me and I know that it could happen again. I know how devastating it is and I know what to expect, what to fear now. I don’t know if I could handle losing another child. I will be thrilled if we get pregnant, but I will also be scared. I don’t want that ambivalence to taint my joy at another pregnancy, to reduce the amount of love I let myself give to a second child, but I am afraid that it will. I also fear that it won’t be so easy this time.
Of semblance with reality, which brings
One in Porte de Montreuil – the most inexpensive of the flea markets where dealers specialize in second-hand clothing (you can find some nice vintage pieces if you are willing to dig a little), house wares and furniture.
……Formerly Known as MJ:
He smiled at me and i saw pure happiness and love shine out from his eyes. He looked like an angel. My hero.
You know how when people talk about travel they always say stuff like “destination is never a place, but a new way of seeing things,” or “experience, travel – these are as education in themselves” or “a ship in harbor is safe, but that is not what ships are built for”? Well when I say “people” I mean “no one”, and when I say “stuff” I mean “things I would actually say only after I’d Google image searched ‘larvae’ and plucked every hair from my head,” but I digress.
Grandma Star Hexagon
Emma's thoughts:
What movie, then, comes close to the look and feel of Cool World? Fred Olen Ray's Evil Toons, which came out the same year, and even starred David Carradine and legendary "that guy" actor Dick (Gremlins) Miller. It's cheap, yeah - obvious ripoff, sure - and you know what? It was still better than Cool World because it never took itself as seriously as our subject here does.
I am simply disappointed in how you behave, its not the first time you've done this according to various individuals, even to the point that this is a common practice for you.
“Helper”: ezer. 19 times in the O.T. 16 times it refers to God as the helper. The superior helping the inferior.
You can watch "The Big Empty" in its entirety via this very post. Just click on the arrow below. I hope you enjoy the film, and I hope you'll share your opinion of it.
Sadly the stories therein are a reflection of a U.K. plunging ever deeper into insanity, and ultimately self destruction.
WRITING PROJECTS
1 3/4 cup Milk
- A square wave is literally on then off, so its wave shape looks brutally, er, square. It produces a mellow but bright sound.
I appreciate the martial arts analogy, and how much more we learn by losing. It is hard to watch my kids get hurt, and have to remember that I would not be the person I am today without the hurts I have suffered, and the lessons that came from that pain–both in learning and compassion for others. One of my favourite quotes is from Will Rogers: “There are three kinds of men. The one that learns by reading. The few who learn by observation. The rest of them have to pee on the electric fence for themselves.” As much as I seek to aim for the first two, the lessons I have learned at some cost are the ones I remember best. (Unfortunately, there are always new fences.)
KIANEL!!
Today we’ve got two for the price of one! Which basically means BOTH OF THE BOOKS ARE STILL FREE!
3. Unclassified Service. It is here where the bulk of the political patronage and nepotism occurs. Individuals are hired at the discretion of the employer, without even advertising the job opening in any form. Often there is no need for a position but someone needs a job and knows a politician who then asks an agency to create a position for that person. No one else has a shot at that job even though it is a public position. Often, the appointees lack the qualifications for the positions or worse, the positions have no genuine work attached to them. Appointees may show up every day on time and still do nothing. Of course, this person is an unconditional political supporter and often a donor to his “benefactor.” Unclassified appointees serve at the discretion of the Appointing Authority and that is why, with every change in government we see a multitude of changes everywhere.
I see married couples everyday all day at my job. It's very easy to distinguish those who have put in the work and those who have not. It makes my day to hear the happiness in the voices of those who have taken the time to strengthen and maintain their relationship, long term. Like I said, marriage is hard work.
I've been here for several years now, so I'm used to ze ax-an français. I find it very charming, it's sweet really no matter how badly they butcher English. But today, for some reason, (Fatigue + Sugar overload + Overworking + Caffiene overload), I couldn't stop giggling during the conference call going on next to me.
Another interesting thought is the taking advantage of Kinect SDK (software development kit) to build apps better suited for the educational environment. Johnny Kissko, an ADE friend and tech whiz, has created the website Kinect Education to promote the creation and sharing of Kinect for education apps. I hope to learn more about this but know I have a ton to learn about programming before I could dream to do this myself. I can, however, dream of apps that could be made: A dynamic geometry app in which my students can unfold polyhedrons into their nets, then refold then and explore volume, surface area and geometric features (edges, vertices, etc.). A celestial exploration in which students are walking across the surface of Mars, floating through the asteroid belt, digging through the chemistry of the sun. A number sense activity where students create arrays and divide quantities into groups - using their bodies.
(Room Conversation —August 16, 1976, Bombay)
The private sector does that.
And the randomly selected winner:
Yeah, I finished the science test and had nothing better to do, so I finished the hat. hee. I’ll take a picture when I finish the cat ears.
which are constructed today are customized and well – furnished with the latest
Then, in one week, I will have my husband pick his favorite design. The winner can choose either a gift certificate to Say It On The Wall OR a free t-shirt vinyl of their design.
4.Did you take any lessons when you were a kid?
It appears they have come out to dispute heinous criminal accusations that they hope to dispel. Check out more on their MySpace page.
On this premise, the AG observed that, in order lawfully to transmit personal data, EU law requires that national legislation must expressly provide an obligation to retain personal data with a view to specifying the categories of data to be retained, purpose and duration for their retention, and the categories of people that can access the data. Using personal data retained for purposes different from those provided by the legislation would be contrary to personal data protection principles.
Article 68
"Herman the Irascible (5 pages, 1904) and "The Purple of the Balkan Kings" (1902, 4 pages) both by Saki
Or do investigative journalists only ever investigate white, right wing, presidents?
A paediatrician was called to help, but was trapped in the hospital's ward 16 behind an electronic gate because the key to unlock the gate couldn't be found.
But wait, listen to this one. Sin is spiritual!!! It’s not physical nor pychological but it’s a spiritual affair. We can’t go to doctors and therapists to deal with our sins. When we sin, we break God’s Spiritual Law. This is what Adam did and he created an embalance and disorder in the universe. The embalance must be balanced and compensated/paid for. Somebody had to pay for what happened in the Garden. Why? Because God is righteous and just and He and sin can’t dwell in the same place. Righteousness and truth are the foundation of Go’d thrown according to Psalm 89:14 so every sin must be judged. He’s not watering Himself down to chang for us, so it’s only through His blood that we are able to fellowship with God again.
futuristic funk-metal freak-out that the boy wonder might have
When we look at a leaf and we see the way which the leaf, or nature, constructs itself, we can clearly see that there is order to the Universe. I must then ask, where in this orderly Universe is there a place for human thought and action? Is humanity, and its associated meaning a natural product of this order, or is it something different, worthy of the title ‘unnatural’? I believe the answer to this question is necessary to understand humanity and its place within the Universe.
The author of the Kebun Malay-Kadazan girls blog has suggested a "seed week" from the 22nd~29th of January in which anyone interested participates by blogging about their experiences as they are related to seeds, bulbs, tubers, rhizomes or cuttings including the collecting, propagating, growing, and/or how to keep them in tip top shape. You can submit a link to her from an old post or a recent one and this is not limited to one post only. So please join in on her seed week so we can all learn from each others experiences.
Some scoff at the notion that politics will drive away the good times. “’Maybe 20,000 out of 80 million Egyptians drink alcohol,’ said a party spokesperson recently, with evident irritation. ‘Forty million don’t have sanitary water. Do you think that, in parliament, I’ll busy myself with people who don’t have water, or people who get drunk?’”
given to me by my Grandma....
You probably know someone a little like Daisy; you may have your own sister of family or choosing who is as dear to you. She's very brainy, to begin with, and funny, and as open with her heart as a songbird with his morning love song. This is no real stretch for there's a good bit of the songbird in Daisy; it is one of the gifts of our family that most of us have music in us, as we have breathing. She is an empath by nature: that person everyone wants to tell everything to, partly for her lack of judgement, partly for her understanding and unpretentious humor and perhaps most of all, for that feeling of finding yourself and your confidences to be the most important thing in the world to her as she listens to you. But lest I paint a silly picture of some sainted being with wings and halo...well, Daisy is as human as everybody. She has issues with her own natal family, professional challenges and road-forks, she has fallen into and out of love, or thought herself in love only to find she'd married someone she hadn't really chosen for herself. In other words, Daisy is special and marvelous and prosaic and not that different from anyone else.
Yeah, I Picniked it, and?
Just my perspective from 12 degrees south of the Equator.
I'm so excited to be hosting Growing in Unity this week and I hope I have not left out any details that I needed to post! However, if I did, I will inform you in other posts this week!
protected while she chanted and worked her spells.
Marrowbones is the story of Nora, a young girl who gets a job working at her werewolf uncle's inn in a haunted swamp. Each issue will be a stand alone story or stories about Nora and her friends. The comic is 46 pages long with comics, maps and drawings. If you like Tim Burton, ghost stories, Mike Mignola, Neil Gaiman's Coraline and The Graveyard Book, Hammer films, Vincent Price and other weird, fun, spooky things you may like this comic.
This brought me to an interesting idea this past week as we were on our way to go eat out. Something I’ve been learning in therapy is that everything (generally speaking) is a choice. No one forces food in my mouth. I choose to eat out. And despite all of my talk about owning up to decisions (such as in the Cliff post), I am horrible at owning up to the fact that I eat out. Sure, I’ll tell you about how we do it all the time, but I will rarely take responsibility while I’m in the act of doing it. This has to stop. As I read what little I could find about eating in more, I found an interesting article (here) about how the first step is to give yourself permission to eat. And really, I don’t. I completely down on myself for eating out. One could go so far to say I hate myself when I eat out.
The evil King Hyperion (Mickey Rourke) is on a campaign of merciless destruction through Greece as he seeks the Epirus bow, a weapon that will grant him the power to unleash the Titans and conquer the world.
I did pick up the book knowing that the film version was imminent and when I do that I tend to picture the actors in the roles as I read. However, the book describes Em as a plain talking, sort of frumpy, bookish Leeds lass and therefore Anne Hathaway didn't immediately present herself in my mind given that description. I'll probably give her the benefit of the doubt and go see it anyway. If Rennee Zellwegger can pull off Bridget Jones I'll give skinny, hard bodied, Hollywood Hathaway a shot as Emma the blue stockinged, sarcastic Yorkshire girl. I just hope she can do a Leeds accent and doesn't resort to a default cock-er-ney twang or the cut glass, pinched nose BBC accent favoured by Bond villains and royalty.
Kristen Stewart taped a guest appearance on the Today show with co-star Charlize Theron and chat with Matt Lauer about their new movie, Snow White and the Huntsman on Monday (March 19) in New York City.
she is flooding her tears on the world and shaking off
Howling Mad Heather hosted one of the most famous Antidisestablishmentarianism protest when she kidnaped every Senator’s cars (or several cars, depending how many they owned) and then pushed each off them off of the HOLLYWOOD sign.
people with such integrity. Such lovely people. They have
The story has also been translated into Urdu, both in poetry and prose, and a short version in English is included in a book ‘The Legends of the Punjab’ written, in 1884, by one Captain R. C. Temple.
The swirl is a Doohickey from Magnolia. The swirl in the right corner is a die from Sizzix.
I hate pimps. With a passion. They are nothing more than human cockroaches scurrying the streets and inner-city passage ways of our great nation. They are abusive to their women, sometimes to the point of being fatal. Women are simply a commodity to them, that's all.
I decide to walk away.
Fans in Indonesia should be very happy because the band’s performances in Jakarta will be one of four shows documented in this series of World Tour.
i noted also that one contributor mentioned she had found her soulmate early on and that the soulmate made it possible for her to chase her dreams
April shaved our dog Rosie tonight and brought me a fistful of hair, hoping to make her point that we should shave the dogs more often.
Be sure to pop by MDUC as there are some gorgeous creations and of course to check out the BINGO board. being shared. I think I say that every fortnight but it is so true!
Despite the overwhelming desire to believe the answer is positive the question must remain unanswerable.
While we cannot even begin to reciprocate the Lord's gift to us, there is "blog candy" on some of the hop stops as a token of appreciation for your comments and encouragement.
What do you want to be doing?
33. Valmont (underworld don) Philosophies (00:38)
All this agitation climaxed in the state elections on 18th April 2011, where despite widespread reports of gerrymandering, vote buying and electoral fraud by the ruling coalition, the opposition gained 15 seats in the state assembly, denying the ruling coalition control over the major cities15. From the public response, it is clear that many see these elections as the high tide mark for Taib’s rule. Sarawakians are now relishing the challenge of political reform ahead of them, illustrated by the 40,000 people who took to the streets in the small capital Kuching in support of reform, one of the biggest rallies in Malaysian history.
They were a pair of PJ’s I bought for my hospital stay when I had brain surgery, April 2011.
Mahmoud Al-Habbash: The Prophet Muhammad said: “Cursing a Muslim constitutes moral depravity, and fighting a Muslim constitutes heresy.” When a person dares to curse a Muslim, he engages in moral depravity. This is not my own personal judgment, but the exact words of the hadith of the Prophet Muhammad.
At the Congress of Vienna, the British pressure Spain, Portugal, France and the Netherlands to agree to abolish the slave trade (though Spain and Portugal are permitted a few years of continued slaving to replenish labor supplies).
Maybe it's because of National Poetry Month that I've been reflecting a lot on why I write poems. This blog has changed dramatically since I began in 2006, and these last couple of years it has become almost exclusively a poetry blog. I never intended it! It's just how things want to come out, a sort of shyness, not wanting to say things directly. I don't apologize, but I do realize poetry isn't for everyone. Funny, this write began as prose. I had every intention of writing prose! But it shaped itself into a poem. What is a person to do when a poem asserts itself?
They (already) knew what their conclusion was going to be, and the idea was not to ascertain the facts of a case, but to reach the right conclusion. This further made our law totalitarian: Recommendation 12 states, “A racist incident is any incident, which is perceived to be racist by the victim, or any other person“.
The sisters gently shook her. She arose and was told that her hour had come.
Have you watched an Ohio State home game lately? The stadium is filled with 50-year old men in face paint – many of whom have never set foot in another building on the Ohio State campus.
Slacker
And if I'm being completely honest, I really don't want to. I want life to freeze right now. Parents in all of their infinite wisdom and awesomeness just stay the same. Nieces in all of their young, adorable, naivety and innocence stay the same. Everything just stays the same because moving forward is actually quite terrifying. I've never been scared by birthdays until this year. There was something about turning 24 and getting closer to 25 that just sent my mind into nostalgia overdrive. I suddenly missed everything about my childhood and wanted nothing more than to lock myself in a room and cry.
Both a short sleeve and a long sleeve are now on this seasons hit list as the Juicy Couture (1st pictured) and the Gap long sleeve (3rd) are both looking a bit bobbled and tatty and the John Lewis (4th) is already sitting in a bag bound for the Charity Shop and with so many brands around to choose from, but as someone who always takes Bloggers recommendations seriously, I decided to have a little look at the Boden Breton.
16. Penelope Pitstop
Now on to the important point of why I am blogging...
I need to go today
What I discovered is that these shoes aren’t made for people with wide feet. I have short little feet that are as wide as the day is long. I must’ve tried on 5-8 pairs of shoes, and they either squished my feet or I couldn’t even get my foot in. I was really disappointed that none of the mary jane styles that I tried worked, and that the only styles that seemed to fit comfortably were these clunky at not at all feminine-looking Keens. I was afraid I’d have to settle for clunky shoes, until I stumbled upon the Vibram five finger shoes. They look creepy, at least I think they do. I’ve always thought that toe socks were creepy looking, and these shoes are no different. But, I did find a pair that I really liked the look of and really liked the fit. In fact, I liked them so much that I convinced DH to try out the five finger shoes for himself.
This first month has been glorious! I've loved how he little personality is finally starting to develop. He definitely knows who his momma is! I've never been happier in all my life!
In fact, anyone caught by the police force taking pictures of others being beaten up, were also beaten up badly. It did not matter if some of these individuals were media personnel, local or foreign; or ordinary Malaysians.
... unless it comes in the form of dessert.
bummer.
But there are sometimes that she is having a toddler tantrum and so far I have been able to settle her down fairly quickly.
A few people commented on these boots when I posted them the other day. They're made by Brako, a Spanish company whose beautiful shoes are designed both for comfort and style. In fact I've made the 3-mile trek to work several times in these already and they're perfect for walking. I found them at a wonderful shoe store here in SF near Union Square, called Nobel Shoes. Brakos seem to be difficult to find this side of the Atlantic even online, so I'm happy to have stumbled upon them in a brick and mortar shop; a shop which incidentally I pass very often on my way to and from work. I expect there may be more Brako shoes in my future.
Four items from today’s NRC Event Reports:
The street sign reads St Peter's Street, and the pub is one of few places where you can find the Organic Best Bitter from the St Peter's Brewery on draft. You would suspect it after noticing that the olive oil dispensers on the tables are old St Peter's bottles.
The simple truth
- Ever had a Quaffable Quadruple?
Speak up and speak out for you and your family. Educate and introduce those close to you about your efforts.
art/decor
Some kind of communication breakdown occurs around part eight of “Shine On You Crazy Diamond Parts 6-9.” Gilmour’s guitar disappears in the mix leaving Waters to doodle around on the bass guitar until he comes in again to complete the song. On the whole the audience’s reaction to the material is a tepid appreciation. The first two new songs especially sound very much like what they are: a sequel to Dark Side Of The Moon exploring in more concrete musical and thematic themes the affects madness has upon the artist.
YOU HAVE JUST READ AN EXCERPT FROM FEZARIU'S EPIPHANY
Well if anyone saw the title of this post pop up and find it wasn't there I apologise. It's freezing cold here in Melbourne this evening and my dog had planted herself on my lap so my laptop was re-located to the arm of the chair. Withing seconds I discovered this was NOT the best way to type as I hit the wrong button and published. As I screeched the dog jumped off and now I'm free to type easily - LOL.
I’m secretly relieved, as I have no idea of the type of hat that would suit such an exotic concotion. Some sort of frothily towering structure of satin, net and feathers, I suppose. Like a Women’s Institute version of Lady Gaga. There wasn’t anything like that in John Lewis the last time I was in there.
This is a very practical study because the topics in the book of James are still relevant today: Patience, temptation, rich and poor, favoritism, judgment, controlling the tongue, wisdom,, our relationship with God, how to treat others, prayer. This study is fantastic! I really can’t say enough good about it. There are DVD’s that go with this that I enjoyed too because of some funny stories she shares from her experience to make her points. In particular, I especially liked hearing about her camping trip with the birds and the hair brush story at the airport. That is one I don’t think I’ll soon forget.
Parchment paper is recyclable and compostable. Cooking with parchment also means you can cook your entire meal in one oven without turning any burners or using lots of hot water to scrub pots and pans.
1992 to 1998
It's a good thing you got to go along on that Mountain Man wilderness camping thing with Zach Face...cuz I'm pretty sure I didn't want you hanging with me at home.
As i finally found an exit and left the screaming and honking melee behind me, the Martin Luther King, that was my stomach, groaned, “I had a dream, when one day i would be able to taste the sweet nectar that is gannay ka juice’
So what is my point? People. The most important thing that you can do is just go, be there for people. We can go and fix houses and do other things for people, and that is great. After this last summer I believe in that more now than ever, it has an important place. It’s an incredible way to help people, but those things are also temporary, whereas people’s lives are eternal.
“What you say?”
Occupy DC media tent guardian, Peace Tent volunteer
When the weather is gloomy
1/4cp onion, diced
And it started with the 12, the leaders.
St John The Baptist Church, located in the centre of Newcastle Upon Tyne, is one of Newcastle's oldest buildings and is a 12th century Grade 1 listed building.
Today's post will also give you a highlight of the upcoming 3 month's kits.
Salon Corbeau. Ugh. The thought just makes me want to break something. It’s really awful. And knowing Locke’s background, it must be absolutely disgusting for him. The Amusement War is just cruel, and nothing else. Lynch really makes you feel it when that girl loses her hair. Horrid. Horrid, horrid, horrid.
It will be interesting to see whether “Battle For Brooklyn” will wind up playing on Channel Thirteen’s air given that its narrative so directly contradicts the kind of Ratner hype associated with Thirteen’s promotion of his basketball arena.
In the meantime, If you are interested in purchasing one or both of the two books available now, please e-mail me and we can go from there.
Gary Johnson – Wish he was there
Joblessness in both countries may worsen as the recession deepens and rigid labor market laws are overhauled. Rajoy passed in February a plan to make it cheaper for employers to let workers go, while Italy gave companies more leeway to fire workers without fear of court-ordered reinstatements.
All Prizes must be claimed by Sunday! Any non claimed prizes will be recycled and given away another day on the Celebration Blog!
*5: Supports on Intel® Core™ processor family with Windows® 7 operating systems.
In the few months that we've been out here, it has become increasingly apparent to me that getting our food from a few miles around where we live is quickly becoming a necessity again.
Trade 3: Encarnacion, Lohse and Scott Downs for Chase Headley, Yovanni Gallardo and Grant Balfour
Air Canada and the IAMAW will have no further comments during the course of these negotiations.
Sadiah Taha is registered at a home address, which we have ascertained is a modest house that has not been occupied for at least 3 years. It is noteworthy that the same home address is also used by Sadiah Taha in a separate company venture, Ciri Kuasa Sdn Bhd, this time run with two daughters of the ex-Telko boss Abang Jemat.
Read the following statement a few times and think about what it means:
To my left, an empty carpark. Two horses in coats, clopping in tandem across that space between buildings. Whingeing whinny and snort.
Today was such a perfect day that I did no useful work at all. Mostly I wandered about outside, enjoying the spring weather. But I also took in John Carter, the movie that Disney in its wisdom decided shouldn't have the words of Mars appended to its title. Synoptic review: If you liked the books when you were young, you'll enjoy it greatly. But if this isn't your sort of thing, then I don't expect you'll give it a try.
I’m sitting in my apartment trying to figure things out. I’m stressing big over money and work. I am beside myself on what to do.
We should prepare ourselves for spiritual experiences before seeking them. True spiritual experiences are a kind of nectar that is coming to us. It is important that we have the proper container to hold that nectar and that the vessel be clean, pure and not contaminated in any way. That vessel is our own body, prana and mind. It is not just enough to have an experience. We must learn to imbibe its essence, just as a bee gathers pollen from a flower.
Right now, Rieckhoff says the future lies in supporting veterans where they need it. The non-profit is currently looking to sponsor veterans to go into Mixed Martial Arts and Ultimate Fighting Championship programs — an outlet for former soldiers that resonates deeply with the community. But in the short term, Rieckhoff says it’s all about moving people to donate.
A couple of years ago, we bought a GunVault MicroVault. This is a portable little handgun vault that operates the same way as our other one, but is much more portable. It comes with a cable to secure it to a piece of furniture or in your vehicle... just don't pull a Barney Fife and secure it around a table leg that can be easily lifted up and off... now which pocket did I put my bullet in?
A bit of a reference to the length and complexity of this post but it is something very close to my heart and I can’t just skim over it. Grab a beer, sit back and relax, and let me know what you reckon.
The video is 12 minutes long which initially almost made me not want to watch it, but it seriously flies by. It's very moving and I think you'll all be able to relate to it in one way or another.
At first it was frustrating, lunch in the pub had seemed like a good idea, but the pub was almost empty so sitting close enough to someone to hear what they were saying would have been far too obvious. A trip round Morrison's gave me a few choice titbits, but not very much. I am also planning a trip to the pub tonight, but after lunchtime I didn't want to leave it to chance, so I headed into the town centre to do some lurking.
At the moment I am absolutely loving Instagram. Instagram in a photo sharing app for I phone. You can use it to add nostalgic effects to your photos, creating something really beautiful.
Elegant in its simplicity and framed within heavy solder of rusted iron hues, a cross of crystal chandelier rosettes with hearts of solder crowns a beautifully patinaed bottle of antique glass. The gentle slope of the bottles' shoulder mirrors the roundness of the rosettes, and the pattern in the veil of patina and the rosettes add texture and interest. Dark, heavy solder sits beautifully at the heart of each rosette of the cross - creating contrast in feel and tone to the delicate nature of the crystal and glass - a beautiful juxtaposition of rustic and refined.
Crumb Cake, So Saffron, Always Artichoke, Whisper White
Here are pictures of the carts I bought for $14.95 each:
Adapted from the Latin by M. D. Usher
Anathema succeed in their excursion from metal in spite of themselves.
6 lb. Klagas 2 Row Pale, Great Western
Jon arrived with his verdant visitors and gave an introduction and explanation. "Hey, how are you guys doing? I'd like you to meet Mors and his wife, Sola," he said, inclining his head toward the pregnant one. "And these are Mors' parents, Tars and Deja."
Brought it all to a stop.
The chronic problem of nuclear proliferation is once again dominating the news. A fierce debate has developed over how to respond to the threat posed by Iran’s nuclear activities, which most experts believe are aimed at producing a nuclear weapon or at least the capacity to assemble one. In this debate, one side is pushing for a near-term military attack to damage or destroy Iran’s nuclear program, and the other side is hoping that strict sanctions against the Islamic Republic will soften it up for a diplomatic solution. Both sides, however, share the underlying assumption that unless outside powers intervene in a dramatic fashion, it is inevitable that Iran will achieve its supposed nuclear goals very soon.
here on the blog, either individually
The reason for this fee is that the printer and distributors that UKUnpublished uses provide:
02 - Let The Good Times Roll 03:50
As I watched the angels worship God this day I caught for a brief moment a beautiful glimpse into an eternity that I did not want to end.
Each devotion includes a question in teen lingo, God’s “text response” from Scripture, insightful reflections, and a daily spiritual app to help girls relate biblical wisdom to everyday needs as they explore:
In yesterday's post I used the metaphor of a grove of trees and its root system to think about the relationship between public and private language and its implication for editing. I figured the writer as the root system and the editor as the tender of the grove. At the end, I discussed how the roots of the trees draw nutrients and water up to the leaves. This is the movement of the writer. However, editors, through photosynthesis and related processes, push downward, adding their own nutrients to the underground. This process is necessary for the tree's survival: private, individual language could not exist without the public.
Now as we all know, the E stands for brain symptoms, and it's not a good idea to start poking about in nervous tissue. However, patients who suffer from severe ME and are bedridden, suffer from severe muscle fatigue and muscle pain, the M part of ME. These are caused by a virus which has hijacked our mitochondria, the energy centres of our cells.
Too often lately we, as an industry, are concerned with how we are getting a message across (social media, print, out-of-home, broadcast, experiential, etc.).
Ng TP, Goh HH, Ng YL, Ong HY, Chia KS, Jeyaratnam J. Male endocrine functions in workers with moderate exposure to lead. Br J Ind Med 1991; 48: 485-491.
Dear Jillian,
Once we reached the gravel flats and exited our enchanted forest, we thought the track would end there as the map indicated, but the trail markers just became orange posts more spread out until they eventually gave way to cairns that did not really follow any rhyme nor reason. As we grabbed a snack, we looked up from the map at a wall of waterfalls. A four or five hundred foot wall stretched out with at least five waterfalls cascading down into small braids of the tributary. At the top it had a relatively flat plateau, where we planned to camp. Further up, we could catch a glimpse of part of Mt. Huxley and the Huxley glacier far higher than we planned on hiking, but beautiful nonetheless.
A fter 20 years of lobbying and planning and four years of hard labor, the Queens Midtown Tunnel, linking Manhattan and Long Island City, Queens, opened on November 15, 1940 to the public. At the time it was the largest, non-federal public works project in the nation.
Another high point of the series was Alex Ovechkin. Though his 2-3-5 line in 7 games was rather pedestrian, especially by Ovechkin standards, he played with the utmost integrity and respect for the game. When an opponent came near him, he didn’t go down as if he’d been shot. When he was hit by an opponent, he wasn’t looking to the refs looking for a call.
Several weeks ago, I won a beautiful "Bloomin' Blossoms" quilting kit from Deonn at Quiltscapes. I was not at all sure that I would be able to make anything of it, but Deonn was so encouraging that I didn't want to let her down, but I kept putting it off. As bored as I made myself yesterday, you would think I would have just sat down and finished it. I did, finally, get tired of pondering the meaning of fat and weather, and it was not nearly as intimidating as I had feared. It's not done yet, but it's coming along nicely. It went really quickly and I really think I'll finish it by the end of next weekend, even working on it little bits at a time.
One man trying to get himself into the conversation is Jamaica’s Asafa Powell, who opened up over 100 meters in Doha on Friday. Running in a heat and a final Powell produced wind aided times of 9.75 (+2.6) and 9.81 (+2.3). Powell displayed what seems to be a change in technique as both races looked different than the typical Powell races of the past. Instead of the immediate burst from the blocks and shorter faster stride pattern over the first 60 meters, there was a more normal start and greater extension throughout the race. It seems that perhaps he is gearing his race to be more competitive with strong finishers Bolt and Gay. Powell was impressive winning against Nesta Carter (9.88), Travis Padgett (9.92) and Michael Frater (9.94) – but then again it was Nesta Carter, Travis Padgett and Michael Frater. And when all are running near or better than their PR’s in May, we know the Doha surface and wind did their jobs – this is where Olusoji Fasuba ran the only 2 sub 10’s of his life including 9.85. So we will have to wait until we get a head to head with Powell and/or Gay to see if his technical changes are successful.
I grew up with an absolutely darling young lady who was plenty book smart, but just had absolutely no common sense whatsoever. Some people are just like that.
Also, the holiodays call for different make-up. It's more festive, sparkly, and colorful. Try this fun holiday look: Start off by lining your eyes with purple eyeliner (the kind I had in mind was from the brand Tarte) and create the cat-eye look. Next use a shimmery, metallicy silver eye shadow all over the eye lid. The shadow should be sparkly. After that, use a shimmery navy shadow for the contour shade. Smudge the navy in the outer corner of your eye and blend into the crease. You can line your bottom lashline with the silver shadow and top with mul;tiple coats of black mascara. You don't have to use those same colors though. Dark shimmery greens work too fro eyeshadow and navy or black liner works too. Have fun with the colors!
I started saving up my measly allowance so that I could go to Musicland at the mall and buy 45s and albums of my own. It didn't matter what the genre was, if it was appealing to me, I bought it.
Choose whole grain breads. The bread test: If the loaf of bread can break a window, you can eat it and serve it to your family.
So enough of the doublespeak. The game is up. You have been rumbled. Own up and apologize. Najib owes Malaysia an apology over the media scandals he created in his vanity, and for wasting the people’s money so foolishly and flagrantly.
Two (of Many) Success Stories:
Fourth, the pay is rubbish. Training wages (which last for 6 months, that’s 2 CT-Nbi-CT circuits) with my company, was $80US/week. And I was a lucky one, some companies won’t pay their trainees. Now, if I was paying my own beers, each weeks’ pay would have been drunk by Thursday. The maximum wage is $200/week for fulltimers ($250ish for part time), but the policy says one pay rise a year, based on performance, and it’s unlikely you would get a pay rise from the lowest to the highest straight away. They say you don’t get rich, and you do it for the love of it, but hell:
I had planned to make a throw-sized quilt of alternating wonky 16-patch blocks with wonky strippy or log-cabin-y blocks. I had every intention of sending this to-be-quilt to Bumble Beans Basics. I almost always make a test block when I'm starting a quilt to be sure I like the combinations of colors and prints, so I started strip-piecing.
The actual indicator set looks as follows:
Patient endurance is what you need now, so that you will continue to do God’s will. Then you will receive all that he has promised. Hebrews 10:36
Schools began to work again, and our days began before dawn with a mad rush for water, running through sniper alleys and no-man’s land to stand for six or seven hours in long queues. Then, we were off to waiting at another line for bread. Sustained for one more day, we hastily changed our “work” clothes and dressed nicely for our daunting run to school.
The riot gets put down, currently “off-camera”, because the final showdown happens between Tania and The Captain, who of course is our Big Bad. The Captain admits to editing Nikki, for the reasons Tania has already uncovered. Nikki, having suffered mightily under this, tries to kill the Captain. In the ensuing scuffle Charles Ng dies instead and Nikki gets knocked out.
Well, I guess that is enough. I have alot to rant about, mainly, I am sad they felt it necessary to lynch Michael Jackson's doctor. They ruined him...in my opinion, he did not murder MJ, or act recklessly...but I guess they didn't pick me or the jury.....
1-1-1-1-1-1-1-1-1-1 Top of Push Up Plank Walk Out…Key Points: Feet wider than shoulder/hand width. Torso tight…remember string tied to navel being pulled straight back. From the Top of Plank position use tiny baby steps with your hands to walk forward and back to start position (ab wheel without the ab wheel). This is a much more precise movement and infinitely harder to perform.
just couldn't get my colouring near right but
My sewing machine is handicapped at the moment. The light has burnt out and it is an hour drive to get another one. It has severely limited the amount of quilting I can get done. Frustrating to say the least. I have been planning future projects instead. Almost as frustrating because I can not begin them until the projects I have on the go are completed.
YOU!
Who are animated by the desire to participate in the Church’s apostolate through membership in the Legion;
To avoid camera shake and ensure that your scene is sharp you will need to stabilize your camera. The best way to do this is to mount your camera on a tripod. If you don’t have a tripod place the camera on a stable surface. If the wind is blowing even the camera strap hitting the tripod will cause some vibrations and can produce blur. Pressing the shutter release on the camera can cause vibrations and may produce blur from camera shake. To overcome this, you need to trigger the camera without touching it. You can use either a remote shutter release or set the camera’s automatic timer set to a 2 second delay.
I make no promises that I will get it done in the next four months, pre-baby, but I'll do my darndest. In the meantime, I have the whole year. ;) I actually do have a gift I have to make for someone from over a year ago on another similar agreement, but I'll be good this year, I promise.
And all you’re surrounded with are the empty cups,
The city recently decided to return a walkway at the south end of the park, connecting to Joralemon Street, to the public (shown at left). The judges had been parking there for several years, but citizens complained about the loss of what had been a pedestrian walkway.
Blue Moon Promise
From the cover: The Oxford University Chest is that august universitys quaint term for its treasury, so called because its curators used to keep the cash in an iron-studded box. Sir John Betjemans book is, therefore, aptly named, for it is a treasure-house of amusing sketches of university life, lyrical tributes to Oxfords pastoral pleasures, and characteristically pungent architectural judgements. First published in 1938, and reproduced here without revision or retrospective embellishment, An Oxford University Chest is a delightful period piece, an unashamedly sentimental evocation of the charms, beauties, and absurdities of Oxford.
Nowadays, people visit these temples often as a kind of hiking entertainment or stamp ralley, but it never lost in its popularity.
Lori over at Apron Strings is hosting a week-long challenge to celebrate Apron Strings 7th Birthday and I decided to play along. My photos have been stacking up quickly because I haven't been scrapping very much lately, so the "one project" per day format is just what I needed to get me back in the groove.
The post on Tuesday, May 10, has instructions for assignments due during the next several weeks. As a reminder…
Esther 5:1 Now it came to pass on the third day, that Esther put on her royal apparel, and stood in the inner court of the king’s house, over against the king’s house: and the king sat upon his royal throne in the royal house, over against the gate of the house.
Wired goes on to relate how, one "cold winter morning," Heatherwick showed the visiting reporter a photograph of "a prototype bridge built at London’s science-focused Imperial College."
Cybill Shepherd (Married to It)
Sell the key peer.
He was a business executive as well. For thirty years, beginning in 1875, he was secretary-general of the Jura-Bern-Lucerne railroad, or as it was later called after a merger, the Jura-Simplon line. This position required, according to Frédéric Passy, «the rarest qualities of exactitude, order, activity, and firmness»2. When the line was purchased by the state in 1903, Ducommun resigned.
I have to say one of the things I admire about the picture is what good value for money it offers. If I'd commissioned it, I'd have been thrilled, for there are dozens of pictures within this one frame - it's not a case of two for the price of one, but several, which I suppose makes Brueghel an early precursor of Tesco's or Walmart on some level, (although no, not really)
I'm glad Papa John's acted swiftly and fired that employee and gave a good apology :) It's still disgusting that that happened at all though, I can't believe people this is okay to do. Also the assistant manager gave a really terrible response to the Huffington Post. -_- Really?
Oh, right, THIS MOVIE IS HORRIBLE. Certain movies get a lot of their garbage excused just for being “campy,” but The Stuff is inexcusably heinous in almost every aspect. Yes, it was trying to be funny, and I’d be lying if I said the absurdity of it all wasn’t entertaining in some ways, but it’s entertaining in spite of itself, not because of any actual jokes or good, sensible humor, like Ghostbusters or Killer Klowns from Outer Space used. The Stuff is just crap. The characters are annoying when they’re not ungodly stupid, the story is full of gaping plot holes and inconsistencies and there are a million things that are never resolved or explained at all. It’s all just too much. While you’re trying to wrap your brain around one ridiculous plot-hole, about a dozen more jump to take its place. There’s no sense, no logic and no brains to any of this.
Tax collectors. The irony of it! These guys were known for taking more than what was necessary and pocketing it for themselves. They were known for their greed! Matthew 11:19 says, The Son of Man came eating and drinking, and they say, “Look, a glutton and a winebibber, a friend of tax collectors and sinners!” But wisdom is justified of her children.
Who was always so kind and so wise,
Time-travel is a central theme of Steampunk,
Anyway, sorry for the sidebar but that is what the heat and humidity in the northeastern US will do to you, not fry, but slowly poach your brain. It will also cause your hair to look like crap most of the time.
“we ain’t seen any fish today but dead ones that is”. These three boys announced to me so sincerely. They were having a nice day floating on the creek pretending this old log was their pirate ship.
6) The Night Circus, by Erin Morgenstern. Everyone in the world has read this novel about a mysterious circus that pitches its tents in the middle of the night and runs on possibly real magic, but for those who haven't, I recommend it. This is one of those books to read over a few days, not a few hours. I said: "This is not a thriller. This is a not an action-packed adventure. It’s not even a simmering revenge or bubbling rivalry novel. It is a novel about a thing, with love in it, and it spans over a decade. If you have a problem with that idea, it’s best you walk away now. But if you like Ann Patchett or Audrey Niffeneggar novels, or if you really thought JONATHAN STRANGE & MR. NORRELL was the bee’s knees, well. WELL. You have just found your next read. Enjoy. I did."
Engine: Goldnight commander(W), Riot ringleader(R), Vigilante justice(R)
They’re a bit more visible in this shot, but the fennel wouldn’t stay still in the wind. We might put some nasturtiums in this bed this year too; the sage, rosemary and oregano won’t grow terribly quickly, nor will the thyme, and nasturtiums would make a pretty filler between the plants.
March 8, 2001; Cape Town, South Africa;
The world is bizarre.
The Bugaboo image I've selected for this week's challenge is "Deacon Heart" and you can find him here at the Bugaboo store. I paired him up with Cosmo Cricket "Circa 1934" papers which I thought would be great on a guy card. A felt heart with a little black clip and some corduroy buttons and we have a Valentine's Day card any boy would love to receive.
Top: Select.
Training gym guy with the super cute dog (I think she really liked him)
“The black Lava rocks on the beach are frequented by large (2-3 ft), disgusting clumsy Lizards. They are as black as the porous rocks over which they crawl & seek their prey from the Sea. I call them 'imps of darkness'. They assuredly well become the land they inhabit.” I have to agree with my son; what's not to love about this remarkable creature?
“Camping preaches the doctrine of predestina­tion, the notion that God has predestine­d some people to be saved and others to hell. He teaches that one cannot know if one is saved or not and can do nothing to find out or to change God’s mind. But you should just live a good life, even with the uncertaint­y. And if you’re saved great. If you’re not, well, tough luck, you’re screwed, even if you were Mother Teresa.
It was the first time I used a sew-on clasp frame. I like the added detail of the visible stitching.
Joe Smith, and two current members of the North Carolina Tarheel roster, Kendall Marshall and James McAdoo. But those are just some of the big names that you may know. The Boo Williams Summer League program has not only produced professional athletes, but also pastors, teachers, coaches and entrepreneurs. The BWSL is a pillar in the Hampton Roads Community and beyond.
There’s something that scares me with this team. I have a hunch that Gasol and Kobe and Sessions are having long chats about how the plays should roll out, with Kobe laughing when they say “hey pass more”, “I will bro, I will” he laughs back, and Bynum has his nose in a book looking aloof and smirking that fuck you smirk, listening. Brown’s nodding along trying to interject new rhythms, new timings (but old news to Kobe and Pau, been playing too long at too many levels) and the lights get white hot surgical all-of-a-sudden: scalpel, showtime.
We have a new challenge for you over at Totally Papercrafts and its my turn to host whooo hoooo!! I've got a fabby fun theme for you to play with. This week we want to see..........
“We can do both,” she instructed. “Just like you salmon.”
Join over 1200+ other followers in the Health Demystified community and subscribe to my exclusive e-newsletter now at: www.ericwangpharmd.com/subscribe
That's the point when you start writing haiku. And that's the point you become a different species. Do you understand? You no longer belong to the human race. You become some kind of bullshit-based lifeform that would have Darwin scratching his fucking noggin, saying, 'Well, fist me into next week, I've obviously fucked something up here.'
The Arab world’s first people’s revolution is also the most media savvy in history. Which is why despots everywhere should be very worried indeed. There has already been a lot of excited talk that the Tunisian uprising is the world’s first Twitter Revolution, Wikileaks Revolution and Facebook Revolution. All of these new media did play crucial roles. Twitter provided second by second updates of events on the ground, operating at its best like a crowd-sourced news agency. Col. Qaddafi in neighbouring Libya blamed a Wikileaks cable from the US embassy, which detailed the ruling family’s breathtaking avarice, for catalysing the unrest. He may be right. Nawaat.org, a Tunisian bloggers collective, even launched tunileaks.org to highlight and discuss the cable's explosive revelations.
So here is a reminder of how it was before....
I am so envious when I read about vintage sellers out there that are tripping around their homes because they have so much inventory. That is one "problem" I wish had, too.
It is not unusual for him to be under my feet especially in my sewing room. Last night I put on “soundscapes” music while I was preparing dinner for our guests. That particular genre of music is what I listen to when sewing. Renegade is very conditioned to that music and when it came on he started up the stairs to my sewing room. He stopped midway when I was not following and looked a little confused.
Community advocates suggest that another means of closing the budget gap would be for the MTA to do a new appraisal of the railyards valued at $271.5 million, and open up bids to other developers who would pay more of the cost upfront. Severe cutbacks in service, layoffs and especially cuts to the student Metrocard program appear unconscionable in light of the MTA’s business agreement with Forest City Ratner.
Performed 149 surgeries
P.E.M 3
Islam: Worship.
I need all the help and support I can get so please, please pass the link to this post far and wide, it’ll be greatly appreciated and we might even save our right to freedom of speech before it’s too late.
Wheat flour as well as buckwheat flour can be used to prepare blini.
that sells MINI MAGNOLIA STAMPS.
Chris Mann from Team Christina finally returned to his opera roots, singing Ave Maria. As a not big fan, I was surprised because he almost won me over with this performance. His control and power and grace are undeniable, and this was definitely my favorite of his performances. I hope he sticks with more opera/classic songs that aren’t too ballad-y next week, songs that he can really go all out on without sounding too cliché.
But wait...some believe I am Drake…so did I talk to Brock, and did Brock laddie realize that I, your friendly neighborhood Former White Hat, is none other than Drake?
5. Place with all the delicious juices in a glass bowl and cover with silver foil to retain juices.
Jon is my rock, the one who makes me less crazy, the one who talks me down, and he was sleeping in England at the time. Fortunately I was prevented from having a complete freakout when Alex told me he did not have a girlfriend and he doesn't want to get married because he wants to live at our house forever.
In “progressive,” open-minded Austin, people care less how you live your life than where you live it. Location is everything.
4) Contact the bloggers I have chosen to let them know that they have been selected!
easy and fun.
Add 7g of yeast into the lukewarm water and pour into the well.
I saw him on a computer screen
Longe line stuff has NEVER been of any interest to her. No matter how much you mix it up. She always throws out some attitude. She'll toss her head and squeal or throw a little bolt and squeal in there. I ignore her and act like it didn't happen. She doesn't get any satisfaction in that and she gives up but, I will notice her attention start to drift. Once I see her start to drift off we don't work too much past that. What's the point? She gave me a solid 30 mins before I saw her start to watch things outside of the arena. That's my clue to chose what positive note I'd like to end on.
The plaintiff, petitioner, applicant or principal party seeking relief in the complaint, petition, application or other initiatory pleadings shall certify under oath in such original pleadings, or in a sworn certification annexed thereto and simultaneously filed therewith, to the truth of the following facts and undertakings: (a) he has not heretofore commenced any other action or proceeding involving the same issues in the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, or any other tribunal or agency; (b) to the best of his knowledge, no such action or proceeding is pending in the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, or any other tribunal or agency; (c) if there is any such action or proceeding which is either pending or may have been terminated, he must state the status thereof; and, (d) if he should thereafter learn that a similar action or proceeding has been filed or is pending before the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals or any other tribunal or agency, he undertakes to report that fact within five (5) days therefrom to the court or agency wherein the original pleading and sworn certification contemplated herein have been filed.
Greeks: Socraties believed he had a Daemon, who spoke wisdom to him from afar.
Awesome! Don't burn the midnight oil, folks.
This is the second book in a series by Rachel Hawkins. The first book was Hex Hall and I loved it. Hex Hall ended with alot of surprised so i've been anxious for about a year to get my hands on this and finally my wish was granted when it came out last month! I'm happy to say that Rachel Hawkins did not disappoint. Demonglass was amazing and I love the cover! Demonglasses is full of witches, warlocks, vampires, werewolves, demons, and hot guys what more could I ask for. Sophie is a strong independent female character that I love. Demonglass explained more about each character as well as introduced some new characters. We learned more about Cal who was introduced in the last book and I really like him. Sophie finally meets her dad who turns out to be pretty cool and in the end there is a very interesting twist with him and I can't wait to read the next book.
Robyn was probably about 4th level and he was pretty pathetic. I loved him anyway. Every single thing Robyn had, I had to claw and scrape to get. He had a +1 gem that absorbed into his quarterstaff -- that was his primary magic item. He also had a cool steel ball that would expand to Indy Jones trap size when rolled at enemies. He also had "the copper tube" or "copper wand". More on that in another post.
The venue was packed with events. There was a couple doing engagement photos, staff setting up for an evening wedding, the American Gourd Society meeting (yes, really!), students taking an educational tour and many families just enjoying the sights.
1 tincture
That concludes Part 1 of my competition prep blog, thanks for sticking it out and reading the whole thing! Stay tuned for Part 2, where I will write about my experiences today and how they differ from when I first started. I will also discuss “why” I compete in physique competitions and what my plans are for preparing for this season after coming back from an injury.
Come to the Triton Square Christmas Party and Picnic outside Atos’ Headquarters on December 16th from 2pm: http://benefitclaimantsfightback.wordpress.com/2011/11/25/a-real-victorian-christmas-party-and-picnic-at-triton-square-friday-16th-december/
Prime Suspect by Lynda La Plante is a riveting crime drama full of mystery and intense suspense.
She asked for a short break in the storm for the sake of the couple getting married.
We walk about another dog, a home with trees and room for visitors.
Then at 9pm they came. I must say what the delivery boy lacked in beauty, my Apple kit most certainly made up for. Everything was there, except the Time Capsule which will be delivered at some point I assume. Although there's still no news on that. Anyway, everything is so gorgeous - even the boxes everything came in was gorgeous. There's no excess styrofoam or other junk, everything is precise and luxoriously made just like my MacBook and Apple Cinema.
Dubious logic re Prospect Heights
This is the result. I drew the stylized tree on the door and made a couple of leave stencils.
I would like to thank Ed for joining me for this adventure. I am now entering the wilderness. Only three more Hartnell stories exist in their entirety, the rest have missing episodes or are audio only. This is where the journey gets difficult and where as they say "everything changes".
In high school I spent a lot of time on the stage. It was a place where I could creep out of my own life and become someone else. It was a place where I could perform. It was a place where I could speak slowly and meaningfully and feel as though I was being heard, listened to, applauded for. It was a place where I could feel brave and passionate and exposed, in the best sort of way. It was a place where I could pretend to be different people. But it was also the place where I discovered who I am.
How young is too young for plastic surgery? And do any of the "older" celebrities above look good to you? Discuss. I'd love to hear what you think ; )
I love the Patrón bottles. Between the stunning hand-blown glass, the cork and what it contains these bottles put me under a spell. And that larger one is worth a mere $100 – the price of such a luxury here in Australia. The smaller, empty one, I bought in New Orleans at the CVS on Canal St.
The fourth problem with the book is that the premise is built on giving money away, which conventional wisdom tells us can be counter intuitive. Never give money to someone living on the street. You can offer to buy them food, but never give them money. After working in the projects for several years, my parents asked what organizations they could give their money to in order to help the poor. I told them, “Don’t give them money, give them your time.” Time is much more valuable and rewarding. But you’re not going to see a prosperity gospel promoting that.
On the Second Sunday the paralytic stands for my own spiritual illness before God. As I make the journey back from exile must ask the Lord for his healing power. I acknowledge my need for healing along the way.
....Yes, it wooks wike Hilwawey is going to be their man. Ha-ha-ha! Isn't that funny? Well, it's funny in Mr. Bush's Neighborhood! I find it funny because she isn't much of a wady anyway.
Three of these failures flowed from the DPD’s decision to accept wholeheartedly Mangum’s word (or whatever version of the truth she happened to be offering at that point in the investigation). As a result, as Cooney pointed out, the DPD never:
That's a situation you really don't want to find yourself in.
Lindsey.
Sprinkle over some brown sugar
But should be back in a few days with a couple of reveals for you!
Status and Submission Western numbers are mainly unusual to pretty common; regionally typical. Southern subspecies-group (bewickii group) declining; altus subspecies (“Appalachian” Bewick’s wren), of doubtful tax­­onomic credibility, decreased to remnant populations; nominate bewickii subspecies, primarily based in Ozarks, decreasing. Large quantity of any inhabitants may be overlooked by experts different with tune. Breeding: environment types more diverse than for most wrens, but shrubby crops always a need. Western individuals consistent dry juniper foothills, luxurious riparian passages, personal regions, etc. Southern subspecies-group formerly populated open woodlands; now wants places with people useless. Migration: american numbers mostly inactive. Southern numbers migratory, with common design of dispersal southern region and west following reproduction. Winter: as reproduction, with usually hotter and lower-elevation element. Vagrant: extralimital information difficult to review. Obvious vagrants in the Eastern may be history, natural migrants, or real vagrants. Obvious vagrants in the Western aspect may talk about advance-guard wildlife engaged in vary expansions. In cheaper Mo and Illinois Stream Valleys, identify between potential vagrants of eastern compared to american numbers.
Maybe if Brad and Angelina ask me, I might reconsider, but I doubt it. I'm not really making a judgment on people who think this is a fine arrangement. Maybe for them it is. I'm just a selfish bitch and I don't like to share.
“Need a lift?” the man called.
That approach yielded what we used to call a "mixed bag" of aesthetic results. On the one hand, there's a whole bunch of third-eye stimulus going on. On the other, a whole lotta "new age" snoozak would be generated as a result. And Basho would occasionally open his yap, as many contemporary observers would point out, to less than fab effect.
The HappyU Exercise
62. his favorite color is blue, and his handphone case is blue and white color.
I crept up and saw it was a tiny baby squirrel. It looked like he was just sleeping, curled up among the blades of grass. I didn’t want to leave him alone since he was so small and could easily be attacked or eaten by another animal. I took a leaf and gently brushed his back. He didn’t move. That’s when I noticed his bottom arm looked like it was bent in a funny position. I slowly rolled him over and saw that it was obviously broken and it had probably been from a fall.
Okay, I started the coffee brewing. If I was going to fit everything in, I had to walk my dogs right away. I was in my pajamas. The dogs didn’t mind. We took the path through the field to the logging road, then crossed Fox Lake Road to Cotter’s trail. We walked the half-mile down to the cabin, then circled around by the pole barns, then on the trail through the woods to the new Murray place, and back out to Fox Lake Road to head back to my house.
to stories of the past
After missing the last week, the past week of induldgence and just the headspace I’ve been in (read my post about it here), I was looking forward to a full body, high intensity interval, anger induced and infused workout. I was amped, driven, convicted!
Asked if people are allowed to gather at the six planned meeting points by Bersih, Mohmad said they are allowed to gather but are prohibited from marching as stipulated under the Peaceful Assembly Act 2011, which was enforced on Monday, adding that those who march or conduct street protests may face possible arrests.
After all, what disease has ever been found to be caused by a lack of a drug?
RICHARD BARNBROOK AM
False flag, state sponsored terrorism, don't do it!
They may seem like a godsend, and they are.
03. Everything goes my way 3:30
Once inside, the nurse said Paula would probably be walking around. I first saw her talking to herself, walking towards me in the hall. She looked pale and thin, and her dark brown hair, always meticulously styled, was completely gray and disheveled. The nurse told her she had a visitor. Unfazed by the fact she didn't know me, I introduced myself and took her hand. She held on tight, just like the flight to San Francisco.
Poems come from there.
Venue: New Park Mall - Cultural Corner
described Ororokpe in
EDITOR: Buildings?
It’s been said that we notice faults in others that we are most guilty of because we are more aware of them. I guess this is a form of confession because I find myself in the passive voice many times when I write and then I must go back and rewrite. How much easier it would be if we made ourselves aware the passive voice and wrote the first draft in the active voice. It would certainly save a lot of time.
Cold late night so long ago
Share your thoughts, pictures, poetry, prose on anything along this vein.
There’s nothing else like Kings & Queens, so if you’re hoping for a read that’s different, twisted and quirky, this is it. And the eBook is currently on sale for $0.99, so you can check it out now and save $3 off the regular price.
On the other hand, if your love is thriving, visit this site for bargain wedding togs!
I have always maintained that if I have to choose between the Devil and the deep blue sea, I can deal with the Devil and live, but would drown with the latter. For that reason, being no lover of the BN, I refuse to support the ideals (or lack thereof) of the opposition.
My week didn't go as planned.....at all. Sugar Bear ended up sick from Saturday morning, until Friday morning. Not even kidding. We didn't leave the house once in that time. I had planned to grab a shot doing something I would normally do on a week day morning, but there just wasn't anything normal about this week at all.
-I made it to Thomasville to see so many friendly faces. I got to meet Floyd and Jessica's newest and most adorable addition. She is beautiful.
Their eyes are on me and their minds are open.
It's just the two of us (not counting the dogs)
What made him do it? His son was hurt so the father came to help him finish.
I thought I would reproduce some of those comments today. The amazing thing is that apparently all of these comments were written by people who actually make a living in marketing.
After Guernica , George Steers eyewitness account in The Times described what he saw as 'without mercy, with system', words that remain tragically pertinent to the bloody legacy of carpet bombing in conflicts ever since. Conflicts that continue across the world.... humanity still descends into darkness.... the Rape of Nanking, the Second World War, the Holocaust, Syria, Bahrain, Cheknya, Rwanda, the continuing confontation between Israel and Palestine......
Some other useful sites...
“No!” I said.
Because my old love, you were just a waste of time…
TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION FOR GLOBAL DEVELOPMENT
Ms. Morton was going places, too. She would become the first African-American mayor of Evanston.
6. Erase This
A2 Krixhjälters, The - The Guardian Of The Society
I can only say I'm sorry I won't see these friends at BlogHer this year and I look forward to seeing them later this year.
I could never use all of the bottom rail as there was no middle support and it sagged really badly. The plastic coat hangers were not that strong you would grab something out and the hanger would snap. I really wanted wooden hangers but I knew they took up more room than the plastic ones .I had purged a huge amount of clothes over the last 12 months but I was determined to make sure that I could use the wooden hangers. I went through all the clothes in my drawers and purged some more clothes to make room for clothes that I wasn't going to hang anymore. I have just managed to fit everything that I wanted to hang. I love the way they look and how the clothes hang on the wooden hangers.
1.Wash the chicken legs thoroughly and make 2 – 3 slits in each of them with kitchen knife. Fill up a sauce pan with enough water and put the chicken legs on high flame for boiling. Add 1.5 tsp of salt and 4 cloves of garlic in the water.
Steal the sandwiches from your picnic basket…
I think there are probably a lot of people out there who have these problems and they just don’t want to discuss them. Things are getting better for “us,” but I think we still have a long way to go. I’ve already said that I don’t want to give out my real name, or associate my “real-life” self with this blog because of my job, but I’m also not afraid of or ashamed of this issue I have. Some of my colleagues who I have kind of become friends with now that I have some of these issues. They know there’s a medication I take for this issue, and they know what it is. (I’m not going to say which one I take in this blog because I really don’t think it’s important.)
What will we do with these magnificent gifts? squander them like Pandora or, as the crop circles so gently nudge and remind us, shall we use these irreplaceable qualities wisely?
Beginning at that center mark, draw a vertical line 4" long
I had a general idea of how I wanted the finished wreath to look, but really just allowed the natural flow of creativity to guide me more than anything, and so it actually turned out very different than I had initially imagined.
Me: I know, honey. Was I there as soon as you were waking up, or did you wake up before I got there?
Her story is not very different from a Bollywood blockbuster script…. A teenager in love; an intimacy manifesting itself physically and a stature-conscious mother.
doar zag j'ons strompelen door de sneeuw verblind
While trying to confirm these items as part of KERS, I’ve learnt some new facts about KERS in F1, which might help to explain these devices. It might convenient to call these units ‘batteries’; however their actual design and purpose might not accurately tally with that term.
In the second half, tracks like 'Ethiopino', 'The Past Is History' and 'Marsvin' represent what Jungle By Night do best - taut, multi-layered grooves that are perfect for dancing to, or any other nocturnal activity you like to indulge in. One thing the boys know how to do is find the pocket and lock it, playing around with time signatures while keeping it dynamic. Perhaps the album's surprise gem is 'Ghettos Of The Mind', a languid, Tuareg-inspired roller where you can almost hear the wind whistling across the desert in the background. Producer Wiboud Burkens (Leon Ware, Michael Franti, Carleen Anderson, N'Dambi) has certainly helped craft the complex JBN dynamics into a coherent shape, which has allowed the band to play and experiment without having to worry about the final sound.
After Ted has finished glaring at me he turns to Rob, "So what are you planning on doing today Rob?" He asks.
But the government insists the £2bn legal aid bill is unaffordable and help has to be targeted at the most serious cases and those most needing support.Ministers are looking to prune £350m from the civil legal aid budget by 2014-5 as part of cuts across government to reduce its deficit.It is thought there will be 500,000 fewer civil cases as a result.
After a tonne of recommendations to 'get on it' the truth is, at first I just plain didn't get it.
I want to learn the psychology of the herd; the language of "tack" and the theory and application of proper shoeing and how to maneuver a trailer....
It is unlikely that our financial institutions will be in a position to meet demand for home mortgage finance for perhaps three to five years hence. Interim measures are essential, not just to meet employment concerns but also to sustain the formation of new households and replacement of older housing stock.
This is the perfect recipe when you are not in mood to cook something elevorate or you don't have enough time and want a quick and easy meal.you can make this in jiffy with very few things,who does not like pasta specially kids ,so try this out ,its very easy and delicious dish.
#421 Snow Vanilla Hot Cocoa Mix ~ White chocolate hot cocoa mix is one of our seasonal favorites. A perfect addition to a snow day.
across the back of his head pulling him closer down on her.His hands
The BBC could have shown its film any time. Why pick the worst possible moment for English football?
Never underestimate the power of.....termites.
I know I shouldn't talk about fall since it is still August, but with everyone being back in school, I get the fall itch. Fall is by far my favorite season. Cooler temperatures, farming, football, apple orchard trip- I could go on and on. I love being able to wear jeans and sweaters, comfy hoodies, and not breaking out the winter coat just yet.
isaac's map is in place.
Summary…
This one’s for Malaysia’s dinosaur politicians :
5-6 leaves Italian kale
The study also found that the effects of the five-day shot regimen lasted for four months, which researchers say is a long time considering that mice only live for two years.
Chennai Live’s, compulsory licencing application is available for download over here. Apart from challenging PPL’s right to collect royalties for U.S. sound recordings, the radio station is also requesting the Copyright Board to issue a compulsory licence on the terms of its August, 2010 judgment mandating a mere 2% royalty. If the 2% royalty judgment of the Copyright Board is implemented with retrospective effect, PPL will have to actually refund ‘Chennai Live’ a sum of Rs. 28 lakhs for the excess royalty charged over the last few years.
The colours above are, from left to right, Hazelnut, Vermont Apple, Sunrise, Bubblegum, Winter Sky, Sunrise (again), Bloomin', and Vermont Rosewood. I had a hard time making up my mind - they are all so beautiful - and Linda allowed me to order a mixed set. I can't wait! But I have to wait - for Tom to get the wood and to make them by hand - each one, just for me. Linda will make my case and Tom will sign it. There is just no comparison. I'll love using my exceptional knitting tools!
Analysis: Claiborne is the general consensus (or Richardson if he gets past the Browns) and that seems likely, but Eric Wright now on the roster, and the likelihood that Janoris Jenkins will still be on the board when they pick in the 2nd Barron provides a good option. With Tanard Jackson gone and schedule that includes Jimmy Graham and Greg Olsen (not to mention an aged, but still dangerous Tony Gonzalez) twice a year Barron provides much needed help over the middle.
And then--
And, finally, the Communist is made up of people like himself.
Tonight's dinner was all comfort food. Juan whipped up a big pot of tomato soup using organic tomato puree that we canned this past summer from our garden. Plus some dehydrated garlic and onions we also preserved from local harvests. I think he put in a little sorghum, which is a sweetener from sorghum cane, made by our neighbors over at Sandhill Farm.
For those of you interested, I just updated my “work from home” page. I’ve added two more sites that I have found to help bring in extra money.
Give a massage to these green goddess.
The remodeling was allegedly being financed from yet unknown sources
May God The Father and The Lord Jesus Christ give to all Christians brothers and sisters peace and love with faith! Amen! May God’s grace be with all those who love Our Lord Jesus Christ with undying love! Amen!
Now for the mishap. You knew there had to be one. There always is. I did not estimate the cooking time of the bird correctly and overcooked it. OMG! I always roast my bird at 425 degrees which takes 2 1/2 to 3 hours for 20 lbs. For some reason, I turned the oven down to 400 degrees and figured about 3 1/2 hours. These are the types of things I am prone to do and they still allow me in the kitchen. When I put the instant read thermometer in, it registered 190 in the thigh (OMG!) and about the same thing in the breast (OMG, OMG!!). I was looking for 160-165 degees and I was getting 190, yikes. So I pulled that turkey out knowing the temperature was still going to rise another 10 degrees (OMG)!!! The funny thing this year is I was worried but I didn't flip out. See I am getting more mature.
commonplace, and the sampler-delic sorcery Bush trailblazed is part
Call us at 631-539-9888 to learn more!
Our house is starting to look like a baby lives here. There's a cupboard in the kitchen now dedicated to your feeding supplies. There's an entire shelf in the bathroom closet filled with rubber duckies, hooded towels, and baby shampoo. A Pack N Play, activity mat, and glider in the living room. A bike trailer, stroller, and Red Flyer wagon in the garage. Carseat installed and ready to go.
Happy Easter to all! We have come to the end of the Christian Lenten Season. Forty days to atone for our sins culminating in the celebration of resurrection, rebirth and renewal. Forty days – Is that all? What about the remaining 325 days (or 326 during a leap year)?
I'd been aware of this rumbling undercurrent for some months, but I
First i picked out a die cut dress, i chopped it a bit to make it a smaller and thinner shape.
Friday I hung out with my cousins and got to bed late.
Preheat oven to 400°F and grease a muffin pan.
Hey little girl you will always make up
Shrink the small, or magnify the hook
It has been busy as we ramp to Easter. The kids have been hiding and searching for eggs in the yard for several weeks now. They all had elaborate Easter parties at school. The day of the parties Will said ' it was the best day of my life'.
1.) He taught me how to love and be loved. He loves me unconditionally, which I always assumed was reserved for pets and children.
I returned it for a refund, after the simple peplum top pattern I designed (using their presets) came out with different side seams length and the armhole 2.5 inches larger than a sleeve cap (???)
One randomly awarded to one of the peeps who participates
Quite often Bill O’Reilly refers to the “Kool-Aid” drinkers amongst us and if you don’t know the reference you can look up Jim Jones and the Jonestown mass suicides. It is about people who insert an impenetrable barrier between themselves, critical thought and reasoning. They subscribe to a belief system in spite of evidence to the contrary. Put another way, Kool-Aid drinkers would not be invited to join MENSA as they are not the sharpest knives in the drawer. They are, in fact, among the dimmest bulbs in the room. Kool-Aid drinkers, simply stated, put very little thought into their beliefs as they rely on others to think for them.
pencils, etc... and used all winter!!
As have several big changes in my life. For example, that's how I ended up moving to North Carolina. See ... I had every intention of moving back to Vermont after finishing graduate school in upstate New York. Then it snowed. In late March. Enough to completely bury my car so it wasn't even a slight bump in the vast sea of white. In very. Late. March. Now I live in North Carolina.
Well, we can't have that, can we? Given this blog's history of posting public domain science fiction stories online, it seems only right and proper that we correct that oversight by posting one or two samples of Miss Long's work here. Thus, we now present, for the first time since its original appearance in the February 1937 issue of Astounding Stories magazine, "Cosmic Fever" by Amelia Reynolds Long (originally published under the byline A. R. Long). As with our previous science fiction posts, the story will be published in a blog-friendly multipart format. Take it away, Miss Long . . .
8. Brad Pitt gets a mention. As does former athlete Kriss Akabusi.
As I examined this feature, I noticed the first water spout. Soon there was another. These lifted, only to be replaced by others. Eventually, I counted seven, but wondered if there were more in the sheet of rain behind the rolling cloud that was almost to the platform. The shoreline had disappeared. Lightning would strike the water every few seconds. The loud cracks - followed by deep rumbles - filled the air with a constant reminder the storm was soon to arrive.
There were several books on our longlist that I really rated too - Keren David's When I was Joe (see above), Tamsyn Murray's quirky black comedy My so-called Afterlife and Marie-Louise Jensen's Daughter of Fire and Ice, to name but three.
That’s when a forgotten, but favorite, Charlie Brown book came to mind, Love is Walking Hand in Hand by Charles Schulz. This book expresses the meaning of love in small moments or actions, as a child does. So, like good ol’ Charlie, I am collecting the child’s view of what love is…
‘Lose the wimples girls
Also, at the Fall, all of creation fell into corruption along with man: decay and death were introduced into the creation. In Romans 5:12 St. Paul says that By one man sin entered the world, and death by sin, and a little later, in Romans 8:20-21, he says that the creation entered into corruption because of man’s sin.
of seven lost years
- Babies are yummy. Toddlers are delicious. Preschoolers are, um, fascinating.
Empty soda bottles with violet blue statice stuffed in their necks.
trowels red clay to sketch another century.
Stavridis asserted that at the NATO summit in Chicago “the 28 NATO nations and the additional 22 partner nations will make a decade-long commitment to Afghanistan post-2014″ in terms of building a NATO-interoperable national military on the borders of Iran, Pakistan and China.
The other viable alternative is to use I&S dollars. I&S dollars can only be used for things like mechanical and building repairs, new construction, building renovation… However, I&S dollars cannot be used for normal expenditures like salaries, programs, utilities…
hug tightly,
WorldWideLovers.com brings potential suitors to life through video, rather than relying simply on words and a few of your best (or not) snapshots. Think you’ve seen all there is to see of Ashton Kutcher? He shares surprising sides of his personality you’ve never seen before in this hilarious video sequence:
The following day I was moving hostel. Chamounix was nice but it was very much a quiet hostel. In the morning I found somebody else who was heading the same way and we booked a taxi to take us across the town. We spent a couple of hours hanging out in down-town before chilling in the Apple Hostel. I met an Australian who introduced me to the basketball play-offs and we watched Lebron James of Miami Heat destroy the New York Knicks. After that we picked up some beers and got chatting with everyone else in the hostel which eventually turned into a foosball tournament one of the biggest games of ring of fire I have ever played. As I write this I am lying in bed nursing the worst hangover of my trip so far.
19. Snuff
This break has lasted too long, the internet is going so slow. It forever to put up the pictures. Mirielle is baking the cookies for Jonathan's birthday at school tomorrow, and to send to Benjamin. I had one bit of Camille's, and one of Char's. I SO want to go have some dough. And a few cookies. But I shall not. I have had a handful of M&M's with some peanuts this afternoon, a few hours ago. So today I have had:
The more I watch the show, though, the more I am in awe of the plot structure. As an English teacher, I usually pay attention to how a story is put together, whether it’s on TV or in a book. As a writer, I have to be aware, but because I can’t plot and outline to save my life, my structure is fixed after I’m done writing. I push the story out and then make sure the structure holds together during revisions.
2. I never really actually paint my nails. If I was the one reading this, I would be surprised since I constantly post about different manicures and such, but those are really just beautiful eye candy to me. I love to craft more than I love having pretty nails, and when they’re too long they just get in my way and I can’t have that. I’ve also spent a good portion of my life working with food, and you’re generally not allowed to wear nail polish when you’re cooking (in case some flakes off) and that’s pretty much what killed my nail painting habits.
Daughter: No I’m having a poo
-Apply a few hundred rhinestones.
As with any garden experience, we have made our share of mistakes this year. For example, we only planted about half of the amount of green beans that we needed to can. We will fix that problem next year. Our second corn planting didn't come up, so we should have replanted more corn. We just didn't pay attention, or realize it until it was too late. We also let the weeds take over the herb garden. My herbs are still producing, but I did lose my Thyme in the process. I can't tell the Thyme from the weeds! I will do better next year.
Read the whole diary. It’s a fascinating piece of “live” history and puts the lie to so many myths.
Avoid bad-mouthing previous /current employers
For 60 years, George Kiprios, aka Rock 'n' Roll George, drove his beloved Holden 48-215 around the streets of Brisbane.
Over-ripe for meltdown
That is really what had me thinking about the title of this post today… “Where were these people when I needed them?” Not in the sense that I expected people to know what was going on of course… I just wish that I knew about their experiences with him because I could have gone to the judge with my own witnesses that would have furthered my case for a long-term restraining order. I want him out of my life forever.
Iceland's thousand years!,
13:36.4 James Munyala 1976
While I was chatting to Al, I was surfing the web, looking at pictures of shoes, I mentioned my quest to Al and before you could say 'Manolo or Louboutin?' she was also online and we were shopping together.
There is usually a decent selection of beers on offer and last time I was in here I had a very good pint of Ringwood Old Thumper and a not so stellar pint of Cornish Coaster – which was no fault of the pub I just don’t find much to enjoy about it!
It was, however, gathered that the President had so far resisted such pressure on the grounds that it was premature to take such an action.
Me: "What exactly is it you are needing?"
Now, I will say that some of the professional politicians know better. And for them to say that we shouldn’t be raising the debt ceiling is irresponsible. They know better.
We waxed on our golf handicaps. We’d both expected to struggle with our games here in Florida, due to unfamiliar courses, and due to all the previously mentioned Florida-in-September conditions (mugginess, soft wet courses, difficult layouts, etc., etc.), and that our handicaps would rise accordingly. But it seems that our golf games have both risen (to some degree) to meet the challenge. Factor in the higher rating/slopes of these courses, and, alas, both our handicaps have fallen, and rather significantly. This is a good problem, I suppose, but it will make competition (for Linda especially) more difficult back in AZ.
He looked up to see 50 men throwing large stones at him. Kanhar prayed. The angry mob took aim but none of the stones touched the Christian. Kanhar lifted a prayer of thanksgiving that enraged the men. They rushed at him, swinging clubs and machetes. Blood pooled quickly around him.
Heinrich B. Ackermann, 38, New York, N.Y.
He asked Ernest to open the gate - and ran smack-dab into the rest of the robbers while they were loading loot into a bakkie. With Abri now also held at gun-point Mrs Henning got behind the wheel of the family car and tried to chase off with her two little girls but instead got into reverse in her fear and backed up into a tree.
I live near Bampton, a village rich in Mayday traditions, with many "sides" as Stephen Fry told me on QI we are supposed to call them, of Morris Men. There is intense rivalry between them and on May 1st much beer is consumed from the many local pubs. The dancing becomes less and less inhibited as the day goes by but that's the only link with fertility I know of (though what goes on behind closed doors is another matter).
What’s your favourite movie, and why? The Princess Bride. It has everything--love, adventure, great dialogue, memorable scenes, fantastic conflicts, humour, and a drool-worthy leading man.
A little back-and-forth between the kids in the car:
“These are our leftovers,” he says.
I wish I could have done more for you. I know you know that. I won’t miss you because your fluffy tail is still everywhere I look. Your leadership, your compassion and your unconditional love will never leave those who you touched or barked at while on earth…
“Yes Uncle I have a lot of workload these days and hardly get an off day.”
Picture on the ceiling
2. Aubrey, Oscar and I headed back to Ikea to tweak the design a little bit and make sure it's all good. The kitchen team at Ikea rocks my world. They are really, really helpful.
For the yellow printed ovals, I created a table in MS Word and inserted each name into a cell. After printing the name tags I used an oval punch to cut out the names. The tag layers were then assembled and attached to the carrots.
How amazing would it be if just 25% of the laid off people were able to volunteer??
Thank for visiting
The purpose of a reader’s report (whether for a publishing house or literary agency) is to help the editor or an agent to evaluate whether or not a project is something that might be worth publishing, representing, considering, or even reading. When we ask you to do a report we are asking for honest feedback. We want to know your thoughts, all of them, on the book.
Starting pitching has been another sore spot so here is a shot in the dark of the five guys I’d slot in the rotation for the time being.
The film was a real 'feel good' movie and we both enjoyed it, though I thought it was a bit schmaltzy and predictable. It certainly captured the sights and sounds of India and had some great laugh out loud moments. Mountain Man gave it a 9/10, whereas I gave it a 7/10, but I'm far more critical than he is.
Attention all Homemakers, Cooks, and Personal Chefs ! ! ! !
Dear Heavenly Father, thank You for teaching me every day of my life the importance of accepting and embracing discipline in my life. I am willing to accept disciple, knowing that it will make me more effective in my walk with You. Thank You for treating me like a son, whom You discipline in love, in Christ Jesus! Amen!
Here is my April ornament finished up. I've just done it plain with a hanger. I would have liked to have used the fuzzy stuff as used on the model but have nothing like it in my stash!
But I did a quick google search and found where someone else has already done them - and has a .pdf with awesome directions. Melissa Stout is a WAY nicer blogger than me. Check out her work HERE.
Fortunately (for me, that is) the vast majority of the emails make this an easy decision.
The children prayed, the preacher preached
The weird thing is, that’s the moment it became real. All that puke, and that was the moment that I finally realized that I got to keep her. She was mine and no one was going to take her away from me. I was a newly christened mommy. Blessed.
225g/8oz wholemeal flour
The centrepiece of this, main, exhibition room is one of the Trabants that were suspended high above the stage on the tour that followed the release of the Achtung Baby record. There is a cameraman on the outside and the presenter is struggling to get comfortable inside before voicing her piece to camera. As much as she’s having her own difficulties getting into the vehicle, one can’t help but wonder how Adrian Boot (who curated all of this) and his merry team of pranksters got the bloody thing inside in the first place.
"What's it called," Lilly asked.
I've also found that doing things like doing the dishes while dinner's cooking, are a giant help when it comes to getting more play time. Brandon and I also have made a pact to, if nothing else, spend at least 45 minutes doing something together - playing a game, watching TV, sitting and talking, doing goal charts or going over the budget - other than eating dinner. We both get swept away by our friends on the weekends and sometimes we lay down on Sunday night and say hi for the first time. Well, we got tired of that, so we aren't doing it anymore. The weekends are pretty different.
A month or so back I read an article that some religious group (twas either Southern Baptists or a Evangelical Christian group but despite internet searches I can not find the article) was urging a boycott of the film. The group claimed that the Tintin works were both racist and promoted alcoholism. The article explained that the issue wasn't with the movie but the collection of books.
Build smaller prisons. ... Large prisons become "violentocracies" -- places ruled by violence and by the threat of violence. In a violentocracy, the most violent people rise to the top. In any prison of any size, the prisoners are going to be pushed toward the level of the most violent persons in the facility. ... In a prison 3,000 people, the entire prison is pushed toward the level of violence created by the five most violent people in the joint. The most violent person finds the second-most violent person and the third-most violent person, and they form an alliance to exploit the weak. Everyone else is compelled to avoid looking weak. ... Large prisons promote paranoia in the prisoners. You never know who in here is waiting for you with a homemade knife. ... A prison of 20 people is, by its very nature, extremely different. You know who is in there with you; you know who you have to stay away from. ... Plus, if you have many small prisons, you can contain the violent people in a limited number of those prisons, the preventing their violent tendencies from infecting the rest of the prison population. ... What you would do, with a network of small prisons, would be to place each prisoner in a facility that is appropriate to the threat that he represents. You grade the prisoners on the threat of violence that they represent, one through ten. You put the tens with the tens and the ones with the ones. Plus, when you move to a system in which some prisoners have more rights and live in more humane conditions, you create a powerful incentive to get into one of the less restrictive prisons.. In a large and horrible prison, the new prisoner thinks "I've got to show everybody here how tough and vicious I really am, so that nobody will mess with me." But when you put a new prisoner in a 24-man prison with 23 other tought guys, and he knows that there are other prisons that are not like this, his natural thought is "I've got to get out of here. I've got to show these people that I am not a crazy, vicious sociopath, so they will move me to some other facility that is not populated by crazy, vicious sociopaths."
and I thought it would be fun for Buga to have her own little place
The Kernel make great beers. Big, bold beers that generally fall into two categories. 'Pale and hoppy', that capture and characterise the essence of the single and mixed hops used and 'dark and roasty', that tip their hat to, and borrow from, the brewing history and tradition of London's dark beers. As the flyer for the event says, "The Kernel are all about upfront hops, lingering bitterness, warming alcohols and bodies of malt."
If you’d like to receive new articles from Slimvictory, you can sign up on my home page to get e-mail updates of newly-published posts. your comments are invited and appreciated.
I used my Sizzix embossing folder for the base of the card.
After success with Pixar jobs brings his passion back to apple. He throws away half of the products that he considers “trash” and he focus on his path to make apple competitive again.
Irish Nationwide Building Society was reported to have provided a 95% mortgage on 20, Grosvenor Square which was formerly home to the US Naval Offices. Handy that, as it was just across from the US Embassy on the other side of the Square which is scheduled to relocate to premises in New Covent Garden (behind the Battersea Power Station site) in 2017. 20 Grosvenor Square was bough by Richard Caring in 2007 for GBP £250m. In May 2009, Westminster City Council granted planning permission to develop the 100,000-square foot building into 41 luxury flats but development has yet to take place.
Simply put, in his day, Elvis was the king of rock'n'roll.
Ways to make your button:
Now onto the real reason of this post. I have a minor light fixture obsession. At the designer warehouse sale I attended last fall (still have to do a post on that sale!) I came home with 4 fixtures, 2 shades and 3 table lamps. For a small townhouse, that's a lot of light. Since moving in, we have added a pendant above the sink, a chandelier above the dining room, changed out 1 flush mount, and added chandeliers in all 3 bedrooms. The only place without a real fixture to call it's own is our small entry way. So when I saw this baby at TJ's my heart started pumping real fast.
as the train announcements make you stir.
Grey and navy striped waterfall cardigan: Flower
And the special touch is the "Happy Spring" stamp. They are "My Pink Stampers" and to order them click HERE .
- Stay 6 nights and the 7th Free
out of their "constrictions" (as Funkadelic put it in "One
I had class on Monday, but I skipped. I had tests in both classes the previous Wednesday and I knew we wouldn't really be doing much that day, so I stayed home with the family. We cleaned up the house; KayTar went to make cookies with my mom; Josh, BubTar, Penny, and I went to meet with Number Twelve at the shelter. The meeting went well enough. No aggression, just mutual avoidance. Fair enough. We housed a dog for a while this summer (a lost dog roaming our street, until we found the owner) and Penny was VERY aggressive, so avoidance was an improvement. They hadn't processed our application yet, so they said they would call when they had. That night we went to a birthday dinner for my father-in-law. The shelter called and left a message saying we were approved! I was still a little unsure...he hadn't been really warm towards us, because he was still so scared and submissive. I also still really wanted a puppy, and he was about a year and a half old. But things were moving along and everyone approved of him, even KayTar, who hates dogs and their jumpy, waggy, licky behavior. So I just let things unfold.
Baxtor
Thai women are sensitive, loving and sensible.
6) any plutocrats out there with a conscience ready to fund some 99%ters (especially Malays) to run on the above 3 items .
Formerly titled “The Homecoming of Jimmy Whitecloud” the film tells the story of a Native American stand-up comedian (David Midthunder) who is chased back to his grandfather (Lee Whitestar) on the reservation by the New York City mob.
It's true, pollinating the pears is most successful when there is more than one tree. But to me, seeking out pollen from another fruit tree owner, just as spring is coming around the corner each year, seems like a pleasant quandry. After all, what is gardening about, if not sharing germs of plant fever that may one day bear fruit in your own garden?
The next morning, I wake up and my head feels like it’s been split into two. The motel room is bright as fuck and it’s a struggle to find my clothes. I locate my underwear near the dresser, my pants near the TV, my shirt balled up between the sheets. College boy is still in bed. I plan my quiet exit.
You never know, after writing this, I may discover my “inside the head screaming” episodes are common and all I need to do is move to a cannabis friendly state for intense treatment…except that I really do believe I am allergic to it. The cannabis, not the cannabis friendly state.
Ooi claimed that Mohamed Razali had a relative who was a policeman and speculated that the relative could have persuaded Mohamed Razali into lodging the police report on Friday that appeared to run counter to the May 8 report Ooi had lodged.
This morning NinjaLoser asked me if I could give him until the 1st before he had to be out. The day before he’s supposed to be gone and he asks. After he flooded my kitchen, and then because water flows down, my nephew’s bedroom that is beneath my kitchen. After he made me go down there and deal with my sister (who was , as expected pissed at him but okay with me) and my brother in law (who was , as expected, pissed at him, but surprisingly okay with me!), then pitched a bloody fit that he was hurt because he fell on the wet tile. And then I when I get home from going North to spend Easter with Huggums (My grandmother on my daddy’s side) he doesn’t say a word. He also left a huge mess of pakcake batter on the damp floor under the wet rugs and towels that he had left out all weekend-after all that plus not working for nearly 3 years, and making me feel like crap because he whines about everything like I don’t do enough and even though he’s not helped a single bit around hte house since we moved- Now I am supposed to fight with Grams ( my grandmother on my mohter’s side) just so that he can rest up and not sleep in the car with a bruised set of ribs.
Thai food. Why? I don’t know. But somehow something tells me they like Thai.
The Dutch East India Company encouraged the Huguenots to immigrate to the Cape because they shared the same religious beliefs, and also because most of them were highly trained craftsmen or experienced farmers, specifically in viticulture and oenology (the growing of grapes and making of wine, brandy and vinegar). They, as well as their descendants, proved that they were hard-working and industrious, and their efforts led to a marked increase in the improvement of quality Cape wines. A number of wine estates have French names to this day, as a reminder of their important contribution to this industry in the Western Cape. Three years after the arrival of Jan van Riebeeck at the Cape, the number of vine plants had increased from 100 in 1655, to 1.5 million in 1700.
Details: Create a 1-page black and white cover for your comic. This should include the title, appropriate picture, author, and chapter name if applicable.
Paul’s daughter Margaret married William Marsh Rice, whose will provided for the establishment of Rice University.
“The Derwent Press has published over 40 books for clients in UK. We are interested in fiction, non-fiction, poetry… in fact any work which reflects a passion for writing, and the author's desire to see their work offered to the public. We offer a partnership publishing service, whereby for a small fee we will transform your manuscript into a professionally produced book, which can then be ordered worldwide on Amazon or at your local bookshop.”
Regardless of your background, I can tell you that most folks' sources say that there's no real explanation for the Twelve Days of Christmas song. Again, regardless of your background, I think we can all agree that a person who can tell you that your version of the story is wrong without giving you the right version is the worst kind of person. Right now I'm that person.
The interviewer uses “forward-thinking” language. The person you’re speaking with might reveal what they’re thinking through subtle hints. “Listen closely to see if the interviewer is giving you any verbal cues about the future,” notes Amanda Haddaway, author of “Destination Real World: Success after Graduation.” “For example, the interviewer might say things like ‘once you start,’ or ‘when you join the team.’ “
So she was taken care of, right? Ha! Coming home today... guess who was waiting outside our apartment building? Cindy Crawford! Oh, I guess I should explain... we started calling her Cindy Crawford since she has a beauty mark above her mouth.
By far what has given me the biggest boosts yet, with the exception of making a book free (more on that in the next section), has been some free promo spots. Be sure you know what you want from each promo: awareness-building (marketing) or immediate sales. For today's post, I'm looking at immediate sales.
are you doing this to me?
It’s time to take to the streets. On May 20-21, the NATO powers are holding a pro-war summit in Chicago. Leaders from the world’s most powerful imperialist governments will be descending on the city to promote an agenda of conquest, genocide and plunder.
Brought to You By the Republican Party: Rick Santorum, former Senator of Pennsylvania.
Theme: Hallowe'en Scary Stories & Wacky Recipes
Collection 2000 Pump Up the Volume Mascara I have a love hate relationship with this, you have to be so careful not to blink after applying it as it takes an age to dry and it clumps really easily. But if you look past that it gives you amazing big lashes.
Hart calls it akin to “An airplane crashing, but the airplane is full of cats,” while Mendonez recalls the reactions of Evan Bernard and Chris Baglivo, the engineers of the record, as “It sounds like a bunch of really cool babies having a party.”
In recent events, the American retailers have been tredding softly due to the downturn in the economy. They have become less risky, more cautious and saving for better times ahead. We, as Canadians, have realized that this is the right time to strike the American retail market.
It’s 3am and i’ve just got home from another bad day at work. I’ve been having days like these far too often for my liking. It’s not anybody now, it’s just me and how i always seem to screw up at work.
“Gomawo baby… saranghae…”Yoochun plant a soft but full of love kiss on Junsu’s forehead.
Did an innocent child bump you in the metro? I hope you enjoy poverty. The tiny, adorable bandit just bled you dry. Your kids' inheritance is long gone.
Maybe, maybe not.
After reading today’s scripture, my crazy mind imagined a debate in which God’s people (both men and women) were running for an office—all nine-months pregnant. When it was each person’s time to define or defend his or her platform, labor began—some with pains of arrogance; other “held their bellies” with pains of humiliation. With either a smirk or a contorted face, they pleaded their case of self-sufficiency or of the need for prayer, forgiveness, and grace. As they spoke, God judged each person individually as to whether they would give birth to a healthy “infant” or a stillborn “baby.”
This experience has changed me. I can’t really tell you in what way, because I don’t know. I’m not different from how I used to be. It’s just something small in me, that feels different. I want more from life. I can do more, I have plenty to offer. I don’t want to look back at my life when I’m 65, and be filled with regret.
We have been baptized in the name of the Blessed Trinity. Our hope for eternal life rests on the divinity of the Son. When Jesus died on the cross, it was not simply a matter of unjust government crushing an innocent citizen—though it was that. It was not just a matter of the noblest man who ever lived dying peacefully for the highest imaginable ideals—though it was that, too. If it were only these things, then the death of Christ would be beautiful and admirable, but it could offer no enduring hope. His death would simply be the most painful of all the human tragedies that make up our history.
When our family moved from Alaska you were the first to revolt. You broke out of your kennel on the way to the plane and terrorized the Anchorage airport until dad could come find you and calm you down. But Seattle wasn’t that bad was it? You loved your yard and walks with mom.
**For Mane and Tail**- Cut pieces of Lt Brown 3-4" long. Attach to the neck & butt area with a "latch hook style" attachment. Do as many or as few pieces as you like.
I just love attending events that draw people from different stages and ages together. I love being in crowded places with music being played loudly and people singing at the top of their voices. I love doing routines together like dancing poco-poco with the crowds, singing the same song with them and I love looking uniformed with others by means of wearing the same T-shirt.
I started the week with the best intentions- posting every day, crafting, cleaning, organizing- but I didn't quite meet my goal. Did I finish my $5 dollar store craft- nope
Florian: I cannot pinpoint one place alone, for me whatever place is the most natural, the most intact is special. An ecosystem where all the different animals play together is where I feel at home. It seems like the world before we influenced it. Some of those places include the arctic or the rainforest of British Columbia, Canada where I watched spirit bears and whales, or it can be a desert where there are not so many animals, but all the animals that are there play together. I will go back to the Arctic one more time and then after that I will go to Baja California to start the Freedom to Roam project. You can check out his next project here!
I woke up early on Sunday, hopped on my bike and went foraging for dandelions. I got some strange looks from passers-by on their morning jog. Whatever. I came home and made this bread for my friends. What could be better for a day in the park than a bread made of flowers? Did I mention the lemony glaze?? There's a lemony glaze!
However, I did remember that I read on someones review that you can connect your Lose It account to your fitbit. What an awesome feature! Some of you may remember that I used to log my food into Lose It a few months ago. I really like Lose It and I always found it to have most of the foods that I eat. It is really great because they have an iPhone app.
I can't believe how many friends I've made since starting this blog and how much I've learned and been inspired by all you crafty friends of mine!
We have been called to task to extend ourselves beyond the usual range of normalcy and push past our prior self-made boundaries of what we think we are capable of. It would be so easy to wallow in the mire of self-pity and defeat, though doing that only short-changes us and those around us from experiencing the truly remarkable. G-d is love. He is great. He makes anew what was once believed to be lost and gone forever. We will not pass up an opportunity for Him to include us in His amazing works. Sharing my milk is only one of the ways this is being done.
Today I meant to post a blog answering some questions tagged for me by fellow bloggers, but I really wanted to share this conversation I had. I shall post my original blog for today in a couple of days time.
All that to say this: I am learning that I can do this. I don’t want to do this, but I can. God’s grace is sufficient. Even if normal never comes.
Both Gleeson and Farrell benefits from the originality of MacDonagh’s script. The dialogue has a matter of fact manner that allows the audience to explore the characters as the film develops. It can be compared to an eccentric Samuel Becketts “Waiting for Godot” or Pulp Fictions “Royale with Cheese” exchange. Despite the obvious contract killing, cocaine/heroine abuse/dealing and prostitution, McDonagh is still able to delve into some serious themes throughout the film.
Strictly speaking, legions were infantry units--the typical disciplined bands of soldiers that we envision when we think of the Roman army. They could be supported by cavalry, ranged troops, and skirmishers, who were essentially guys with spears who were sent out onto the field to die. Typically, the auxiliary troops were comprised of provincial soldiers. A typical legionnaire would have a spear (called a pilus), a sword sword (the gladius) a shield (scutum) and some light chain mail (lorica hamata).
BEDTIME! Any time you attract my attention after 9 pm, I will put your ass to bed.
a lonely longing.
NOTE: I also have wine or beer with dinner everyday, so some calories are from alcohol.
Hey Mac folks: this handy chart (and you can also view it in “table” mode.. just click the tab on the far right of the page) helps you understand if OS X Lion will work with your current desktop apps… including the beasts from Adobe.
Ah writing, the therapy session without the time restriction, the fantasy boyfriend who asks, “What are you thinking about?” The mother that tells me to keep trying, the father that tells me to prove…EVERYTHING.
I see nobody, for miles around I can see everything but I can see nobody. No signs of life, no lights, no smoke billowing from terraced housing balanced halfway up the mountainous man-made hill to the left of my eye-line.
The one known as The Former White Hat forewarned to not trust any post claimed to be by Mr. Fulford and this article, not written in Mr. Fulford’s textual stylization, is proof that the admonishment is one of value.
He deals the cards to find the answer
DROWN THEIR BUTTS
Beyond that, I’ve just been hanging out. When I should be studying. Like right now.
Open Heaven time
But, to no avail could it be found.
5.Norway 123
I hope your Christmas bookish haul was just as fabulous! What did you get? *all agog*
King Herod turned back to the window once again gazing at the twinkling lights of the skyscrapers. He had not been feeling well lately, but this challenge ; this threat whether perceived or otherwise gave him strength of purpose.
needs. Jesus declared that we cannot serve both God and Money. If we choose the world’s system, we will become increasingly hostile to the things of God. If we opt for God’s kingdom, we will grow increasingly distrustful of money.
I always knew that you would hurt me to death some day, but I hoped to choose the time and place. You’ve always been unconsciously hostile to me and I have tried to conciliate you by hacking away at my love for you, cutting it down to the little thing that was the most you wanted. I am always at a loss when I meet hostility, because I can love and I can do practically nothing else.
9:47 am. I have finished the set up rows for the diamond scarf we’re knitting in class. Never has seed stitch made my hands shake so much. Performance anxiety.
Bathroom: White and black, along with some silver
The further good news is the CP2 project team’s indication that OHIM will use a “means-what-it-says” approach, and that with a common practice based on these class scopes “OHIM will not give any special treatment anymore to the Nice class headings”. One final point is on concerns that we may be heading for a requirement to use only pre-approved terms in applications. OHIM has though been at pains when asked that that will not be the case, ie that the use of pre-approved goods/services will not be a requirement for getting a valid filing date. That seems important in a world of fast changing commercialities and technology". This, Richard adds, is the end on this short series on issues which may need attention following the Court’s IP TRANSLATOR judgment. He hopes that this series will trigger more debate and thoughts on the legal and practical shapes the EU trade mark law and practice may take in the very near future.
"How can you be so sure?" asked the chief.
The subject, identity, and/or the individual is realized through a spatial/relational orientation with its milieu. This is an affective relationship. One that allows for all parties involved to enact change on each other. Without this relationship constituted in this way, nothing can occur within the modernist or postmodernist ideal as we have defined it (if we can truly say that it is something that can be defined). Interactivity occurs within the encounter and experience derived of actively perceiving these images that afford us the opportunity to think outside given frameworks. There is no cause and effect type of relationship here as these perceptions and the subsequent meaning – created, not derived – from them occur in the instantaneous moments which we perceive as we “enter-act” (as opposed to merely interact) with pieces. They are created in praesenti. As Hume would note, cause and effect is inferred – it is not given. It is a construction that humanity uses to make the world sensible or intelligible and occurs a posteriori. Hindsight is always 20/20. Thus is logic and causality. Our knowledge and meaning emerges in that miraculous duration of attentive tinkering we call perception. “ . . . The emergence of both individual and milieu – following a course [devenir] in which preliminary tensions are resolved but also preserved . . . the conservation of being through becoming”[7]. Any democratic notions inherent within these works are upheld through this tension. This tension is the creative force, in the in-between (mediation or medius in its pure etymological sense), that materializes the memories and stories told through the interaction one enters into with the photography in the exhibit and billboards displayed throughout the city.
“Stronghold Movement” feat. Breeze Evahflowin
I guess with that being said, from all of us here at the Color Throwdown, we wish you a very, merry holiday and a happy new year!! It's been an awesome year of challenges! See you in January!!!
Focus on expanding Miracle Kids’ Triathlon cancer charity to St. Peter, Minnesota
...even in 1903. And, the humor and wit is hard to find, the best of the lot seems to be a complicated story Abraham Lincoln told a some office seekers about a Chinese emperor hiring a donkey as an advisor.
CD 11: Trigger - woah!
An in-laws dance is a special dance where the bride dances with her father-in-law and the groom dances with his mother-in-law. You choose one song for both couples to dance to at the same time. You can have the in-laws dance at any point during the reception but I would suggest after the first dance, father/daughter and groom/mother dances.
The food was okay for us. I wouldn’t say it was wow-level, but you could tell that the dishes were carefully prepared, and they were made from fresh ingredients. Hubby says the Salisbury was flavorful, and he did debate on whether to get an extra cup of rice or not. The pasta’s serving size was just right. It had no shrimp, but the fish fillet was cream dory fish. And out of the number of times I’ve had seafood pasta, this is the first time that I have seen crabsticks mixed in, but I have to admit that it wasn’t bad at all. I wonder why nobody ever thought of it before. The service was good too, and the servers were knowledgeable on the menu offerings.
I had periods that last 7 days to three or four months. Then I sometimes go 2-3 months without my period (in which case I always freak out that I'm prego). Since the new birth control, my periods are regular now but I'm still having a very hard time losing weight. I only consume about 1,000 calories a day but I seem to be gaining weight still. Until the last 2 months or so, I never gained back any of the weight. I would lose it and it would be gone, even if I was "bad" with my diet for a week or something. So I'm confused again- and frustrated.
Rodney Yee and his nature background are even more relaxing when fluorescent lighting is eliminated.
We were all miserably full but we enjoyed the food and had a great time!
Private and personal prayer points
OK i want you to write “WRITING BOOKS LIKE A BOSS” under my latest facébook post.
“About two miles out,” Tanner replied. “Coming from the direction of Omaha.”
96. The Broken Thing Peter Swift
Dahlia Seed - Mothman Split Tour 7" 300 Pressed Red Vinyl ... Troubleman Unlimited 1995
He had a beautiful speech he gave me that I will never forget. He began his speech by telling me to "Keep Growing", which is how he signed the CTI recording I brought to the concert. It now hangs framed on my wall. He also added this:
my shirt isn't ironed
We had a brainstorming session so that we could introduce ourselves and say what had interested us by our chosen 'fragments'. I settled on working with the greeny shell in the box and I also used the encrusted piece of plastic I found on the beach in Cornwall some time ago.
I am not here to judge a friend (the so called road bully) simply because the video did not really show what actually happened before my friend maneuvered his car out from the parking lot. If indeed he was the road bully then very sadly, it was rather unbecoming of that old classmate of mine to have charged at the "parking attendant" just because he knocked on his bonnet to ask him to go forward in order for another car to park in.
I think the easiest part would be wrapping the legs. But how would you do the body? Hmm...anyone think this would make a great IKEA hack? I don't actually have space or need for a stool like this right now, but I can dream...
You'll probably need to remove one of your oven
So this is where the guilt sets it. This community that has given me so much I haven't been a part of lately. And as a planner of the Chicago get-together (maybe you've heard of it?) I feel a bit like a hypocrite. But that's why pencils have erasers.
Miliband needn't get too carried away, Labour did well despite him not because of him. Labour would be in terminal trouble if they hadn't done as well as they did on Thursday. It doesn't mean they can win a general election, otherwise they would have sent the Tories into terminal decline which, despite good results, they didn't. Deep down people know that the bankers were a contributory factor to a Labour economic mess, they aren't stupid enough to fall for Labour blaming it all on the bankers.
I wanted to share with you what our county does each year for our children. Each school in the county has a health fair. Students from The University Of Alabama come in mass and do all kinds of screenings on our children.
The study of design patterns has been excessively ad-hoc, and some have argued that the concept sorely needs to be put on a more formal footing. At Oopsla 1999, the Gang of Four were (with their full cooperation) subjected to a show trial, in which they were “charged” with numerous crimes against computer science. They were “convicted” by ⅔ of the “jurors” who attended the trial.
Oh boy do I get attention! Not only are my girls adorable, I have two of them and I dress them in super cute clothes so naturally I get a ton of smiles and stares from others everywhere we go. The smiles I love but the comments that follow sometimes annoy me or just plain make me laugh! Here is a list I put together (with humor in my heart) of all the things we hear on a daily basis that you should just not say!
Horse: Dk Brown (used Patons Astra Dark Tan)
sages advising, and
It's stuck.
Diddy Kong Antagonism was a nice-looking bold if it was aboriginal arise on the Nintendo 64. The anatomy bulk isn’t decidedly fast, which hurts the game’s faculty of speed, but it is solid and about never slows down. The textures aren’t all that able-bodied done, but the DS isn’t in actuality a arrangement powerhouse, so it’s harder to assault the bold for it. Diddy Kong still looks acceptable from a abstruse standpoint, but there’s absolute little adroitness to be actuate in the art. The bold uses ablaze colors to actualize the about cartoon-like world, but advance and appearance designs feel dated. None of the advance settings are absolute original, nor are the characters, as they effluvium of anyone aggravating badly to achieve their admirable animals bolt on as mascots.
6. Do you believe in aliens from other planets and what do you think they look like?
This is a QED (quick, easy, delicious) recipe. It took no time to put together the cheese part and I let the cherries cook, while I was making dinner, only checking on it and mixing it, occasionally.
12. Caffeine disrupts your normal adenosine receptors, which control the brain, kidneys, gastrointestinal system, cardiovascular system and respiratory system. Caffeine triggers the neurons to fire uncontrollably throughout the body.
The documentary begins in the 1980′s, by following the boys as they walked a thousand miles to escape their war-ridden homeland. During the five years they walked in search of safety, thousands died from starvation, dehydration, bomb raids and genocidal murder. Finally, they found relative safety in Kenya’s Kakuma refugee camp. In 2001, 3,600 lost boys, including John, Daniel and Panther, were invited by the United States to live in America. Assisted by Catholic Charities International, the three boys uproot their lives and once again embark on a journey, leaving behind thousands of other refugees who, had become their family.
Do you live in Washington DC and are tired of waiting long hours in line? Well, Linestanding.com provides persons to stand in line anywhere in the greater Washington DC area, and specializes in United States Congressional hearings and their respective committees. You can order online and get a stander to wait at your chosen designation until they are able to rendezvous with you, the attendee. The company also creates a sign with a name of your choice so you can easily identify the stander in line. How cool is that?
I've made two red seat pads for the munchkins to use their other grandparent's two single buggies. I've made these to measure with slits so the straps will go through.
So – as always, when faced with a situation like this, I go back to ye’ol faithful creative/comedic route.
After that decision, that is when four more states seceded, so as not to help invade their fellow states. So, after the Northern decision to invade the South, then the seven states became eleven. Seven before, eleven after.
Although they did it a bit more tongue and cheek. I will say the same thing I said there. This is a shitty baiting tactic to increase views and hits.
But too much of it is old hat now, and that applies just as much to my own posts as to what I mostly skip in other people’s blogs. So that’s number one.
Publication Date: First published in 1989 by McPhee Gribble Publishers. This edition published in 2005
